These are verses of the Qur'an,-a book that makes (things) clear;
A guide: and glad tidings for the believers,-
Those who establish regular prayers and give in regular charity, and also have (full) assurance of the hereafter.
As to those who believe not in the Hereafter, We have made their deeds pleasing in their eyes; and so they wander about in distraction.
Such are they for whom a grievous Penalty is (waiting); and in the Hereafter theirs will be the greatest loss.
As to thee, the Qur'an is bestowed upon thee from the presence of one who is wise and all-knowing.
Behold! Moses said to his family: "I perceive a fire; soon will I bring you from there some information, or I will bring you a burning brand to light our fuel, that ye may warn yourselves.
But when he came to the (fire), a voice was heard: "Blessed are those in the fire and those around: and glory to God, the Lord of the worlds.
"O Moses! verily, I am God, the exalted in might, the wise!....
"Now do thou throw thy rod!" But when he saw it moving (of its own accord)as if it had been a snake, he turned back in retreat, and retraced not his steps: "O Moses!" (it was said), "Fear not: truly, in My presence, those called as apostles have no fear,-
"But if any have done wrong and have thereafter substituted good to take the place of evil, truly, I am Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
"Now put thy hand into thy bosom, and it will come forth white without stain (or harm): (these are) among the nine Signs (thou wilt take) to Pharaoh and his people: for they are a people rebellious in transgression."
But when Our Signs came to them, that should have opened their eyes, they said: "This is sorcery manifest!"
And they rejected those Signs in iniquity and arrogance, though their souls were convinced thereof: so see what was the end of those who acted corruptly!
We gave (in the past) knowledge to David and Solomon: And they both said: "Praise be to God, Who has favoured us above many of his servants who believe!"
And Solomon was David's heir. He said: "O ye people! We have been taught the speech of birds, and on us has been bestowed (a little) of all things: this is indeed Grace manifest (from God.)"
And before Solomon were marshalled his hosts,- of Jinns and men and birds, and they were all kept in order and ranks.
At length, when they came to a (lowly) valley of ants, one of the ants said: "O ye ants, get into your habitations, lest Solomon and his hosts crush you (under foot) without knowing it."
So he smiled, amused at her speech; and he said: "O my Lord! so order me that I may be grateful for Thy favours, which thou hast bestowed on me and on my parents, and that I may work the righteousness that will please Thee: And admit me, by Thy Grace, to the ranks of Thy righteous Servants."
And he took a muster of the Birds; and he said: "Why is it I see not the Hoopoe? Or is he among the absentees?
"I will certainly punish him with a severe penalty, or execute him, unless he bring me a clear reason (for absence)."
But the Hoopoe tarried not far: he (came up and) said: "I have compassed (territory) which thou hast not compassed, and I have come to thee from Saba with tidings true.
"I found (there) a woman ruling over them and provided with every requisite; and she has a magnificent throne.
"I found her and her people worshipping the sun besides God: Satan has made their deeds seem pleasing in their eyes, and has kept them away from the Path,- so they receive no guidance,-
"(Kept them away from the Path), that they should not worship God, Who brings to light what is hidden in the heavens and the earth, and knows what ye hide and what ye reveal.
"God!- there is no god but He!- Lord of the Throne Supreme!"
(Solomon) said: "Soon shall we see whether thou hast told the truth or lied!
"Go thou, with this letter of mine, and deliver it to them: then draw back from them, and (wait to) see what answer they return"...
(The queen) said: "Ye chiefs! here is delivered to me - a letter worthy of respect.
"It is from Solomon, and is (as follows): 'In the name of God, Most Gracious, Most Merciful:
"'Be ye not arrogant against me, but come to me in submission (to the true Religion).'"
She said: "Ye chiefs! advise me in (this) my affair: no affair have I decided except in your presence."
They said: "We are endued with strength, and given to vehement war: but the command is with thee; so consider what thou wilt command."
She said: "Kings, when they enter a country, despoil it, and make the noblest of its people its meanest thus do they behave.
"But I am going to send him a present, and (wait) to see with what (answer) return (my) ambassadors."
Now when (the embassy) came to Solomon, he said: "Will ye give me abundance in wealth? But that which God has given me is better than that which He has given you! Nay it is ye who rejoice in your gift!
"Go back to them, and be sure we shall come to them with such hosts as they will never be able to meet: We shall expel them from there in disgrace, and they will feel humbled (indeed)."
He said (to his own men): "Ye chiefs! which of you can bring me her throne before they come to me in submission?"
Said an 'Ifrit, of the Jinns: "I will bring it to thee before thou rise from thy council: indeed I have full strength for the purpose, and may be trusted."
Said one who had knowledge of the Book: "I will bring it to thee within the twinkling of an eye!" Then when (Solomon) saw it placed firmly before him, he said: "This is by the Grace of my Lord!- to test me whether I am grateful or ungrateful! and if any is grateful, truly his gratitude is (a gain) for his own soul; but if any is ungrateful, truly my Lord is Free of all Needs, Supreme in Honour !"
He said: "Transform her throne out of all recognition by her: let us see whether she is guided (to the truth) or is one of those who receive no guidance."
So when she arrived, she was asked, "Is this thy throne?" She said, "It was just like this; and knowledge was bestowed on us in advance of this, and we have submitted to God (in Islam)."
And he diverted her from the worship of others besides God: for she was (sprung) of a people that had no faith.
She was asked to enter the lofty Palace: but when she saw it, she thought it was a lake of water, and she (tucked up her skirts), uncovering her legs. He said: "This is but a palace paved smooth with slabs of glass." She said: "O my Lord! I have indeed wronged my soul: I do (now) submit (in Islam), with Solomon, to the Lord of the Worlds."
We sent (aforetime), to the Thamud, their brother Salih, saying, "Serve God": But behold, they became two factions quarrelling with each other.
He said: "O my people! why ask ye to hasten on the evil in preference to the good? If only ye ask God for forgiveness, ye may hope to receive mercy.
They said: "Ill omen do we augur from thee and those that are with thee". He said: "Your ill omen is with God; yea, ye are a people under trial."
There were in the city nine men of a family, who made mischief in the land, and would not reform.
They said: "Swear a mutual oath by God that we shall make a secret night attack on him and his people, and that we shall then say to his heir (when he seeks vengeance): 'We were not present at the slaughter of his people, and we are positively telling the truth.'"
They plotted and planned, but We too planned, even while they perceived it not.
Then see what was the end of their plot!- this, that We destroyed them and their people, all (of them).
Now such were their houses, - in utter ruin, - because they practised wrong- doing. Verily in this is a Sign for people of knowledge.
And We saved those who believed and practised righteousness.
(We also sent) Lut (as an apostle): behold, He said to his people, "Do ye do what is shameful though ye see (its iniquity)?
Would ye really approach men in your lusts rather than women? Nay, ye are a people (grossly) ignorant!
But his people gave no other answer but this: they said, "Drive out the followers of Lut from your city: these are indeed men who want to be clean and pure!"
But We saved him and his family, except his wife; her We destined to be of those who lagged behind.
And We rained down on them a shower (of brimstone): and evil was the shower on those who were admonished (but heeded not)!
Say: Praise be to God, and Peace on his servants whom He has chosen (for his Message). (Who) is better?- God or the false gods they associate (with Him)?
Or, Who has created the heavens and the earth, and Who sends you down rain from the sky? Yea, with it We cause to grow well-planted orchards full of beauty of delight: it is not in your power to cause the growth of the trees in them. (Can there be another) god besides God? Nay, they are a people who swerve from justice.
Or, Who has made the earth firm to live in; made rivers in its midst; set thereon mountains immovable; and made a separating bar between the two bodies of flowing water? (can there be another) god besides God? Nay, most of them know not.
Or, Who listens to the (soul) distressed when it calls on Him, and Who relieves its suffering, and makes you (mankind) inheritors of the earth? (Can there be another) god besides God? Little it is that ye heed!
Or, Who guides you through the depths of darkness on land and sea, and Who sends the winds as heralds of glad tidings, going before His Mercy? (Can there be another) god besides God?- High is God above what they associate with Him!
Or, Who originates creation, then repeats it, and who gives you sustenance from heaven and earth? (Can there be another) god besides God? Say, "Bring forth your argument, if ye are telling the truth!"
Say: None in the heavens or on earth, except God, knows what is hidden: nor can they perceive when they shall be raised up (for Judgment).
Still less can their knowledge comprehend the Hereafter: Nay, they are in doubt and uncertainty thereanent; nay, they are blind thereunto!
The Unbelievers say: "What! when we become dust,- we and our fathers,- shall we really be raised (from the dead)?
"It is true we were promised this,- we and our fathers before (us): these are nothing but tales of the ancients."
Say: "Go ye through the earth and see what has been the end of those guilty (of sin)."
But grieve not over them, nor distress thyself because of their plots.
They also say: "When will this promise (come to pass)? (Say) if ye are truthful."
Say: "It may be that some of the events which ye wish to hasten on may be (close) in your pursuit!"
But verily thy Lord is full of grace to mankind: Yet most of them are ungrateful.
And verily thy Lord knoweth all that their hearts do hide. As well as all that they reveal.
Nor is there aught of the unseen, in heaven or earth, but is (recorded) in a clear record.
Verily this Qur'an doth explain to the Children of Israel most of the matters in which they disagree.
And it certainly is a Guide and a Mercy to those who believe.
Verily thy Lord will decide between them by His Decree: and He is Exalted in Might, All-Knowing.
So put thy trust in God: for thou art on (the path of) manifest Truth.
Truly thou canst not cause the dead to listen, nor canst thou cause the deaf to hear the call, (especially) when they turn back in retreat.
Nor canst thou be a guide to the blind, (to prevent them) from straying: only those wilt thou get to listen who believe in Our Signs, and they will bow in Islam.
And when the Word is fulfilled against them (the unjust), we shall produce from the earth a beast to (face) them: He will speak to them, for that mankind did not believe with assurance in Our Signs.
One day We shall gather together from every people a troop of those who reject our Signs, and they shall be kept in ranks,-
Until, when they come (before the Judgment-seat), (God) will say: "Did ye reject My Signs, though ye comprehended them not in knowledge, or what was it ye did?"
And the Word will be fulfilled against them, because of their wrong-doing, and they will be unable to speak (in plea).
See they not that We have made the Night for them to rest in and the Day to give them light? Verily in this are Signs for any people that believe!
And the Day that the Trumpet will be sounded - then will be smitten with terror those who are in the heavens, and those who are on earth, except such as God will please (to exempt): and all shall come to His (Presence) as beings conscious of their lowliness.
Thou seest the mountains and thinkest them firmly fixed: but they shall pass away as the clouds pass away: (such is) the artistry of God, who disposes of all things in perfect order: for he is well acquainted with all that ye do.
If any do good, good will (accrue) to them therefrom; and they will be secure from terror that Day.
And if any do evil, their faces will be thrown headlong into the Fire: "Do ye receive a reward other than that which ye have earned by your deeds?"
For me, I have been commanded to serve the Lord of this city, Him Who has sanctified it and to Whom (belong) all things: and I am commanded to be of those who bow in Islam to God's Will,-
And to rehearse the Qur'an: and if any accept guidance, they do it for the good of their own souls, and if any stray, say: "I am only a Warner".
And say: "Praise be to God, Who will soon show you His Signs, so that ye shall know them"; and thy Lord is not unmindful of all that ye do.
Ta. Sin. Mim.
These are Verses of the Book that makes (things) clear.
We rehearse to thee some of the story of Moses and Pharaoh in Truth, for people who believe.
Truly Pharaoh elated himself in the land and broke up its people into sections, depressing a small group among them: their sons he slew, but he kept alive their females: for he was indeed a maker of mischief.
And We wished to be Gracious to those who were being depressed in the land, to make them leaders (in Faith) and make them heirs,
To establish a firm place for them in the land, and to show Pharaoh, Haman, and their hosts, at their hands, the very things against which they were taking precautions.
So We sent this inspiration to the mother of Moses: "Suckle (thy child), but when thou hast fears about him, cast him into the river, but fear not nor grieve: for We shall restore him to thee, and We shall make him one of Our apostles."
Then the people of Pharaoh picked him up (from the river): (It was intended) that (Moses) should be to them an adversary and a cause of sorrow: for Pharaoh and Haman and (all) their hosts were men of sin.
The wife of Pharaoh said: "(Here is) joy of the eye, for me and for thee: slay him not. It may be that he will be use to us, or we may adopt him as a son." And they perceived not (what they were doing)!
But there came to be a void in the heart of the mother of Moses: She was going almost to disclose his (case), had We not strengthened her heart (with faith), so that she might remain a (firm) believer.
And she said to the sister of (Moses), "Follow him" so she (the sister) watched him in the character of a stranger. And they knew not.
And we ordained that he refused suck at first, until (His sister came up and) said: "Shall I point out to you the people of a house that will nourish and bring him up for you and be sincerely attached to him?"...
Thus did We restore him to his mother, that her eye might be comforted, that she might not grieve, and that she might know that the promise of God is true: but most of them do not understand.
When he reached full age, and was firmly established (in life), We bestowed on him wisdom and knowledge: for thus do We reward those who do good.
And he entered the city at a time when its people were not watching: and he found there two men fighting,- one of his own religion, and the other, of his foes. Now the man of his own religion appealed to him against his foe, and Moses struck him with his fist and made an end of him. He said: "This is a work of Evil (Satan): for he is an enemy that manifestly misleads!"
He prayed: "O my Lord! I have indeed wronged my soul! Do Thou then forgive me!" So (God) forgave him: for He is the Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
He said: "O my Lord! For that Thou hast bestowed Thy Grace on me, never shall I be a help to those who sin!"
So he saw the morning in the city, looking about, in a state of fear, when behold, the man who had, the day before, sought his help called aloud for his help (again). Moses said to him: "Thou art truly, it is clear, a quarrelsome fellow!"
Then, when he decided to lay hold of the man who was an enemy to both of them, that man said: "O Moses! Is it thy intention to slay me as thou slewest a man yesterday? Thy intention is none other than to become a powerful violent man in the land, and not to be one who sets things right!"
And there came a man, running, from the furthest end of the City. He said: "O Moses! the Chiefs are taking counsel together about thee, to slay thee: so get thee away, for I do give thee sincere advice."
He therefore got away therefrom, looking about, in a state of fear. He prayed "O my Lord! save me from people given to wrong-doing."
Then, when he turned his face towards (the land of) Madyan, he said: "I do hope that my Lord will show me the smooth and straight Path."
And when he arrived at the watering (place) in Madyan, he found there a group of men watering (their flocks), and besides them he found two women who were keeping back (their flocks). He said: "What is the matter with you?" They said: "We cannot water (our flocks) until the shepherds take back (their flocks): And our father is a very old man."
So he watered (their flocks) for them; then he turned back to the shade, and said:"O my Lord! truly am I in (desperate) need of any good that Thou dost send me!"
Afterwards one of the (damsels) came (back) to him, walking bashfully. She said: "My father invites thee that he may reward thee for having watered (our flocks) for us." So when he came to him and narrated the story, he said: "Fear thou not: (well) hast thou escaped from unjust people."
Said one of the (damsels): "O my (dear) father! engage him on wages: truly the best of men for thee to employ is the (man) who is strong and trusty"....
He said: "I intend to wed one of these my daughters to thee, on condition that thou serve me for eight years; but if thou complete ten years, it will be (grace) from thee. But I intend not to place thee under a difficulty: thou wilt find me, indeed, if God wills, one of the righteous."
He said: "Be that (the agreement) between me and thee: whichever of the two terms I fulfil, let there be no ill-will to me. Be God a witness to what we say."
Now when Moses had fulfilled the term, and was travelling with his family, he perceived a fire in the direction of Mount Tur. He said to his family: "Tarry ye; I perceive a fire; I hope to bring you from there some information, or a burning firebrand, that ye may warm yourselves."
But when he came to the (fire), a voice was heard from the right bank of the valley, from a tree in hallowed ground: "O Moses! Verily I am God, the Lord of the Worlds....
"Now do thou throw thy rod!" but when he saw it moving (of its own accord) as if it had been a snake, he turned back in retreat, and retraced not his steps: O Moses!" (It was said), "Draw near, and fear not: for thou art of those who are secure.
"Move thy hand into thy bosom, and it will come forth white without stain (or harm), and draw thy hand close to thy side (to guard) against fear. Those are the two credentials from thy Lord to Pharaoh and his Chiefs: for truly they are a people rebellious and wicked."
He said: "O my Lord! I have slain a man among them, and I fear lest they slay me.
"And my brother Aaron - He is more eloquent in speech than I: so send him with me as a helper, to confirm (and strengthen) me: for I fear that they may accuse me of falsehood."
He said: "We will certainly strengthen thy arm through thy brother, and invest you both with authority, so they shall not be able to touch you: with Our Sign shall ye triumph,- you two as well as those who follow you."
When Moses came to them with Our clear signs, they said: "This is nothing but sorcery faked up: never did we head the like among our fathers of old!"
Moses said: "My Lord knows best who it is that comes with guidance from Him and whose end will be best in the Hereafter: certain it is that the wrong-doers will not prosper."
Pharaoh said: "O Chiefs! no god do I know for you but myself: therefore, O Haman! light me a (kiln to bake bricks) out of clay, and build me a lofty palace, that I may mount up to the god of Moses: but as far as I am concerned, I think (Moses) is a liar!"
And he was arrogant and insolent in the land, beyond reason,- He and his hosts: they thought that they would not have to return to Us!
So We seized him and his hosts, and We flung them into the sea: Now behold what was the end of those who did wrong!
And we made them (but) leaders inviting to the Fire; and on the Day of Judgment no help shall they find.
in this world We made a curse to follow them and on the Day of Judgment they will be among the loathed (and despised).
We did reveal to Moses the Book after We had destroyed the earlier generations, (to give) Insight to men, and guidance and Mercy, that they might receive admonition.
Thou wast not on the Western side when We decreed the Commission to Moses, nor wast thou a witness (of those events).
But We raised up (new) generations, and long were the ages that passed over them; but thou wast not a dweller among the people of Madyan, rehearsing Our Signs to them; but it is We Who send apostles (with inspiration).
Nor wast thou at the side of (the Mountain of) Tur when we called (to Moses). Yet (art thou sent) as Mercy from thy Lord, to give warning to a people to whom no warner had come before thee: in order that they may receive admonition.
If (We had) not (sent thee to the Quraish),- in case a calamity should seize them for (the deeds) that their hands have sent forth, they might say: "Our Lord! why didst Thou not sent us an apostle? We should then have followed Thy Signs and been amongst those who believe!"
But (now), when the Truth has come to them from Ourselves, they say, "Why are not (Signs) sent to him, like those which were sent to Moses?" Do they not then reject (the Signs) which were formerly sent to Moses? They say: "Two kinds of sorcery, each assisting the other!" And they say: "For us, we reject all (such things)!"
Say: "Then bring ye a Book from God, which is a better guide than either of them, that I may follow it! (do), if ye are truthful!"
But if they hearken not to thee, know that they only follow their own lusts: and who is more astray than one who follow his own lusts, devoid of guidance from God? for God guides not people given to wrong-doing.
Now have We caused the Word to reach them themselves, in order that they may receive admonition.
Those to whom We sent the Book before this,- they do believe in this (revelation):
And when it is recited to them, they say: "We believe therein, for it is the Truth from our Lord: indeed we have been Muslims (bowing to God's Will) from before this.
Twice will they be given their reward, for that they have persevered, that they avert Evil with Good, and that they spend (in charity) out of what We have given them.
And when they hear vain talk, they turn away therefrom and say: "To us our deeds, and to you yours; peace be to you: we seek not the ignorant."
It is true thou wilt not be able to guide every one, whom thou lovest; but God guides those whom He will and He knows best those who receive guidance.
They say: "If we were to follow the guidance with thee, we should be snatched away from our land." Have We not established for them a secure sanctuary, to which are brought as tribute fruits of all kinds,- a provision from Ourselves? but most of them understand not.
And how many populations We destroyed, which exulted in their life (of ease and plenty)! now those habitations of theirs, after them, are deserted,- All but a (miserable) few! and We are their heirs!
Nor was thy Lord the one to destroy a population until He had sent to its centre an apostle, rehearsing to them Our Signs; nor are We going to destroy a population except when its members practise iniquity.
The (material) things which ye are given are but the conveniences of this life and the glitter thereof; but that which is with God is better and more enduring: will ye not then be wise?
Are (these two) alike?- one to whom We have made a goodly promise, and who is going to reach its (fulfilment), and one to whom We have given the good things of this life, but who, on the Day of Judgment, is to be among those brought up (for punishment)?
That Day (God) will call to them, and say "Where are my 'partners'?- whom ye imagined (to be such)?"
Those against whom the charge will be proved, will say: "Our Lord! These are the ones whom we led astray: we led them astray, as we were astray ourselves: we free ourselves (from them) in Thy presence: it was not us they worshipped."
It will be said (to them): "Call upon your 'partners' (for help)" :they will call upon them, but they will not listen to them; and they will see the Penalty (before them); (how they will wish) 'if only they had been open to guidance!'
That Day (God) will call to them, and say: "What was the answer ye gave to the apostles?"
Then the (whole) story that Day will seem obscure to them (like light to the blind) and they will not be able (even) to question each other.
But any that (in this life) had repented, believed, and worked righteousness, will have hopes to be among those who achieve salvation.
Thy Lord does create and choose as He pleases: no choice have they (in the matter): Glory to God! and far is He above the partners they ascribe (to Him)!
And thy Lord knows all that their hearts conceal and all that they reveal.
And He is God: There is no god but He. To Him be praise, at the first and at the last: for Him is the Command, and to Him shall ye (all) be brought back.
Say: See ye? If God were to make the night perpetual over you to the Day of Judgment, what god is there other than God, who can give you enlightenment? Will ye not then hearken?
Say: See ye? If God were to make the day perpetual over you to the Day of Judgment, what god is there other than God, who can give you a night in which ye can rest? Will ye not then see?
It is out of His Mercy that He has made for you Night and Day,- that ye may rest therein, and that ye may seek of his Grace;- and in order that ye may be grateful.
The Day that He will call on them, He will say: "Where are my 'partners'? whom ye imagined (to be such)?"
And from each people shall We draw a witness, and We shall say: "Produce your Proof": then shall they know that the Truth is in God (alone), and the (lies) which they invented will leave them in lurch.
Qarun was doubtless, of the people of Moses; but he acted insolently towards them: such were the treasures We had bestowed on him that their very keys would have been a burden to a body of strong men, behold, his people said to him: "Exult not, for God loveth not those who exult (in riches).
"But seek, with the (wealth) which God has bestowed on thee, the Home of the Hereafter, nor forget thy portion in this world: but do thou good, as God has been good to thee, and seek not (occasions for) mischief in the land: for God loves not those who do mischief."
He said: "This has been given to me because of a certain knowledge which I have." Did he not know that God had destroyed, before him, (whole) generations,- which were superior to him in strength and greater in the amount (of riches) they had collected? but the wicked are not called (immediately) to account for their sins.
So he went forth among his people in the (pride of his wordly) glitter. Said those whose aim is the Life of this World: "Oh! that we had the like of what Qarun has got! for he is truly a lord of mighty good fortune!"
But those who had been granted (true) knowledge said: "Alas for you! The reward of God (in the Hereafter) is best for those who believe and work righteousness: but this none shall attain, save those who steadfastly persevere (in good)."
Then We caused the earth to swallow up him and his house; and he had not (the least little) party to help him against God, nor could he defend himself.
And those who had envied his position the day before began to say on the morrow: "Ah! it is indeed God Who enlarges the provision or restricts it, to any of His servants He pleases! had it not been that God was gracious to us, He could have caused the earth to swallow us up! Ah! those who reject God will assuredly never prosper."
That Home of the Hereafter We shall give to those who intend not high- handedness or mischief on earth: and the end is (best) for the righteous.
If any does good, the reward to him is better than his deed; but if any does evil, the doers of evil are only punished (to the extent) of their deeds.
Verily He Who ordained the Qur'an for thee, will bring thee back to the Place of Return. Say: "My Lord knows best who it is that brings true guidance, and who is in manifest error."
And thou hadst not expected that the Book would be sent to thee except as a Mercy from thy Lord: Therefore lend not thou support in any way to those who reject (God's Message).
And let nothing keep thee back from the Signs of God after they have been revealed to thee: and invite (men) to thy Lord, and be not of the company of those who join gods with God.
And call not, besides God, on another god. There is no god but He. Everything (that exists) will perish except His own Face. To Him belongs the Command, and to Him will ye (all) be brought back.
A.L.M.
Do men think that they will be left alone on saying, "We believe", and that they will not be tested?
We did test those before them, and God will certainly know those who are true from those who are false.
Do those who practise evil think that they will get the better of Us? Evil is their judgment!
For those whose hopes are in the meeting with God (in the Hereafter, let them strive); for the term (appointed) by God is surely coming and He hears and knows (all things).
And if any strive (with might and main), they do so for their own souls: for God is free of all needs from all creation.
Those who believe and work righteous deeds,- from them shall We blot out all evil (that may be) in them, and We shall reward them according to the best of their deeds.
We have enjoined on man kindness to parents: but if they (either of them) strive (to force) thee to join with Me (in worship) anything of which thou hast no knowledge, obey them not. Ye have (all) to return to me, and I will tell you (the truth) of all that ye did.
And those who believe and work righteous deeds,- them shall We admit to the company of the Righteous.
Then there are among men such as say, "We believe in God"; but when they suffer affliction in (the cause of) God, they treat men's oppression as if it were the Wrath of God! And if help comes (to thee) from thy Lord, they are sure to say, "We have (always) been with you!" Does not God know best all that is in the hearts of all creation?
And God most certainly knows those who believe, and as certainly those who are Hypocrites.
And the Unbelievers say to those who believe: "Follow our path, and we will bear (the consequences) of your faults." Never in the least will they bear their faults: in fact they are liars!
They will bear their own burdens, and (other) burdens along with their own, and on the Day of Judgments they will be called to account for their falsehoods.
We (once) sent Noah to his people, and he tarried among them a thousand years less fifty: but the Deluge overwhelmed them while they (persisted in) sin.
But We saved him and the companions of the Ark, and We made the (Ark) a Sign for all peoples!
And (We also saved) Abraham: behold, he said to his people, "Serve God and fear Him: that will be best for you- If ye understand!
"For ye do worship idols besides God, and ye invent falsehood. The things that ye worship besides God have no power to give you sustenance: then seek ye sustenance from God, serve Him, and be grateful to Him: to Him will be your return.
"And if ye reject (the Message), so did generations before you: and the duty of the apostle is only to preach publicly (and clearly)."
See they not how God originates creation, then repeats it: truly that is easy for God.
Say: "Travel through the earth and see how God did originate creation; so will God produce a later creation: for God has power over all things.
"He punishes whom He pleases, and He grants Mercy to whom He pleases, and towards Him are ye turned.
"Not on earth nor in heaven will ye be able (fleeing) to frustrate (his Plan), nor have ye, besides God, any protector or helper."
Those who reject the Signs of God and the Meeting with Him (in the Hereafter),- it is they who shall despair of My Mercy: it is they who will (suffer) a most grievous Penalty.
So naught was the answer of (Abraham's) people except that they said: "Slay him or burn him." But God did save him from the Fire. Verily in this are Signs for people who believe.
And he said: "For you, ye have taken (for worship) idols besides God, out of mutual love and regard between yourselves in this life; but on the Day of Judgment ye shall disown each other and curse each other: and your abode will be the Fire, and ye shall have none to help."
But Lut had faith in Him: He said: "I will leave home for the sake of my Lord: for He is Exalted in Might, and Wise."
And We gave (Abraham) Isaac and Jacob, and ordained among his progeny Prophethood and Revelation, and We granted him his reward in this life; and he was in the Hereafter (of the company) of the Righteous.
And (remember) Lut: behold, he said to his people: "Ye do commit lewdness, such as no people in Creation (ever) committed before you.
"Do ye indeed approach men, and cut off the highway?- and practise wickedness (even) in your councils?" But his people gave no answer but this: they said: "Bring us the Wrath of God if thou tellest the truth."
He said: "O my Lord! help Thou me against people who do mischief!"
When Our Messengers came to Abraham with the good news, they said: "We are indeed going to destroy the people of this township: for truly they are (addicted to) crime."
He said: "But there is Lut there." They said: "Well do we know who is there : we will certainly save him and his following,- except his wife: she is of those who lag behind!"
And when Our Messengers came to Lut, he was grieved on their account, and felt himself powerless (to protect) them: but they said: "Fear thou not, nor grieve: we are (here) to save thee and thy following, except thy wife: she is of those who lag behind.
"For we are going to bring down on the people of this township a Punishment from heaven, because they have been wickedly rebellious."
And We have left thereof an evident Sign, for any people who (care to) understand.
To the Madyan (people) (We sent) their brother Shu'aib. Then he said: "O my people! serve God, and fear the Last Day: nor commit evil on the earth, with intent to do mischief."
But they rejected him: Then the mighty Blast seized them, and they lay prostrate in their homes by the morning.
(Remember also) the 'Ad and the Thamud (people): clearly will appear to you from (the traces) of their buildings (their fate): the Evil One made their deeds alluring to them, and kept them back from the Path, though they were gifted with intelligence and skill.
(Remember also) Qarun, Pharaoh, and Haman: there came to them Moses with Clear Signs, but they behaved with insolence on the earth; yet they could not overreach (Us).
Each one of them We seized for his crime: of them, against some We sent a violent tornado (with showers of stones); some were caught by a (mighty) Blast; some We caused the earth to swallow up; and some We drowned (in the waters): It was not God Who injured (or oppressed) them:" They injured (and oppressed) their own souls.
The parable of those who take protectors other than God is that of the spider, who builds (to itself) a house; but truly the flimsiest of houses is the spider's house;- if they but knew.
Verily God doth know of (every thing) whatever that they call upon besides Him: and He is Exalted (in power), Wise.
And such are the Parables We set forth for mankind, but only those understand them who have knowledge.
God created the heavens and the earth in true (proportions): verily in that is a Sign for those who believe.
Recite what is sent of the Book by inspiration to thee, and establish regular Prayer: for Prayer restrains from shameful and unjust deeds; and remembrance of God is the greatest (thing in life) without doubt. And God knows the (deeds) that ye do.
And dispute ye not with the People of the Book, except with means better (than mere disputation), unless it be with those of them who inflict wrong (and injury): but say, "We believe in the revelation which has come down to us and in that which came down to you; Our God and your God is one; and it is to Him we bow (in Islam)."
And thus (it is) that We have sent down the Book to thee. So the People of the Book believe therein, as also do some of these (pagan Arabs): and none but Unbelievers reject our signs.
And thou wast not (able) to recite a Book before this (Book came), nor art thou (able) to transcribe it with thy right hand: In that case, indeed, would the talkers of vanities have doubted.
Nay, here are Signs self-evident in the hearts of those endowed with knowledge: and none but the unjust reject Our Signs.
Ye they say: "Why are not Signs sent down to him from his Lord?" Say: "The signs are indeed with God: and I am indeed a clear Warner."
And is it not enough for them that we have sent down to thee the Book which is rehearsed to them? Verily, in it is Mercy and a Reminder to those who believe.
Say: "Enough is God for a witness between me and you: He knows what is in the heavens and on earth. And it is those who believe in vanities and reject God, that will perish (in the end).
They ask thee to hasten on the Punishment (for them): had it not been for a term (of respite) appointed, the Punishment would certainly have come to them: and it will certainly reach them,- of a sudden, while they perceive not!
They ask thee to hasten on the Punishment: but, of a surety, Hell will encompass the Rejecters of Faith!-
On the Day that the Punishment shall cover them from above them and from below them, and (a Voice) shall say: "Taste ye (the fruits) of your deeds!"
O My servants who believe! truly, spacious is My Earth: therefore serve ye Me - (and Me alone)!
Every soul shall have a taste of death in the end to Us shall ye be brought back.
But those who believe and work deeds of righteousness - to them shall We give a Home in Heaven,- lofty mansions beneath which flow rivers,- to dwell therein for aye;- an excellent reward for those who do (good)!-
Those who persevere in patience, and put their trust, in their Lord and Cherisher.
How many are the creatures that carry not their own sustenance? It is God who feeds (both) them and you: for He hears and knows (all things).
If indeed thou ask them who has created the heavens and the earth and subjected the sun and the moon (to his Law), they will certainly reply, "God". How are they then deluded away (from the truth)?
God enlarges the sustenance (which He gives) to whichever of His servants He pleases; and He (similarly) grants by (strict) measure, (as He pleases): for God has full knowledge of all things.
And if indeed thou ask them who it is that sends down rain from the sky, and gives life therewith to the earth after its death, they will certainly reply, "God!" Say, "Praise be to God!" But most of them understand not.
What is the life of this world but amusement and play? but verily the Home in the Hereafter,- that is life indeed, if they but knew.
Now, if they embark on a boat, they call on God, making their devotion sincerely (and exclusively) to Him; but when He has delivered them safely to (dry) land, behold, they give a share (of their worship to others)!-
Disdaining ungratefully Our gifts, and giving themselves up to (worldly) enjoyment! But soon will they know.
Do they not then see that We have made a sanctuary secure, and that men are being snatched away from all around them? Then, do they believe in that which is vain, and reject the Grace of God?
And who does more wrong than he who invents a lie against God or rejects the Truth when it reaches him? Is there not a home in Hell for those who reject Faith?
And those who strive in Our (cause),- We will certainly guide them to our Paths: For verily God is with those who do right.
A. L. M.
The Roman Empire has been defeated-
In a land close by; but they, (even) after (this) defeat of theirs, will soon be victorious-
Within a few years. With God is the Decision, in the past and in the Future: on that Day shall the Believers rejoice-
With the help of God. He helps whom He will, and He is exalted in might, most merciful.
(It is) the promise of God. Never does God depart from His promise: but most men understand not.
They know but the outer (things) in the life of this world: but of the End of things they are heedless.
Do they not reflect in their own minds? Not but for just ends and for a term appointed, did God create the heavens and the earth, and all between them: yet are there truly many among men who deny the meeting with their Lord (at the Resurrection)!
Do they not travel through the earth, and see what was the end of those before them? They were superior to them in strength: they tilled the soil and populated it in greater numbers than these have done: there came to them their apostles with Clear (Signs). (Which they rejected, to their own destruction): It was not God Who wronged them, but they wronged their own souls.
In the long run evil in the extreme will be the End of those who do evil; for that they rejected the Signs of God, and held them up to ridicule.
It is God Who begins (the process of) creation; then repeats it; then shall ye be brought back to Him.
On the Day that the Hour will be established, the guilty will be struck dumb with despair.
No intercessor will they have among their "Partners" and they will (themselves) reject their "Partners".
On the Day that the Hour will be established,- that Day shall (all men) be sorted out.
Then those who have believed and worked righteous deeds, shall be made happy in a Mead of Delight.
And those who have rejected Faith and falsely denied our Signs and the meeting of the Hereafter,- such shall be brought forth to Punishment.
So (give) glory to God, when ye reach eventide and when ye rise in the morning;
Yea, to Him be praise, in the heavens and on earth; and in the late afternoon and when the day begins to decline.
It is He Who brings out the living from the dead, and brings out the dead from the living, and Who gives life to the earth after it is dead: and thus shall ye be brought out (from the dead).
Among His Signs in this, that He created you from dust; and then,- behold, ye are men scattered (far and wide)!
And among His Signs is this, that He created for you mates from among yourselves, that ye may dwell in tranquillity with them, and He has put love and mercy between your (hearts): verily in that are Signs for those who reflect.
And among His Signs is the creation of the heavens and the earth, and the variations in your languages and your colours: verily in that are Signs for those who know.
And among His Signs is the sleep that ye take by night and by day, and the quest that ye (make for livelihood) out of His Bounty: verily in that are signs for those who hearken.
And among His Signs, He shows you the lightning, by way both of fear and of hope, and He sends down rain from the sky and with it gives life to the earth after it is dead: verily in that are Signs for those who are wise.
And among His Signs is this, that heaven and earth stand by His Command: then when He calls you, by a single call, from the earth, behold, ye (straightway) come forth.
To Him belongs every being that is in the heavens and on earth: all are devoutly obedient to Him.
It is He Who begins (the process of) creation; then repeats it; and for Him it is most easy. To Him belongs the loftiest similitude (we can think of) in the heavens and the earth: for He is Exalted in Might, full of wisdom.
He does propound to you a similitude from your own (experience): do ye have partners among those whom your right hands possess, to share as equals in the wealth We have bestowed on you? Do ye fear them as ye fear each other? Thus do we explain the Signs in detail to a people that understand.
Nay, the wrong-doers (merely) follow their own lusts, being devoid of knowledge. But who will guide those whom God leaves astray? To them there will be no helpers.
So set thou thy face steadily and truly to the Faith: (establish) God's handiwork according to the pattern on which He has made mankind: no change (let there be) in the work (wrought) by God: that is the standard Religion: but most among mankind understand not.
Turn ye back in repentance to Him, and fear Him: establish regular prayers, and be not ye among those who join gods with God,-
Those who split up their Religion, and become (mere) Sects,- each party rejoicing in that which is with itself!
When trouble touches men, they cry to their Lord, turning back to Him in repentance: but when He gives them a taste of Mercy as from Himself, behold, some of them pay part-worship to other god's besides their Lord,-
(As if) to show their ingratitude for the (favours) We have bestowed on them! Then enjoy (your brief day); but soon will ye know (your folly).
Or have We sent down authority to them, which points out to them the things to which they pay part-worship?
When We give men a taste of Mercy, they exult thereat: and when some evil afflicts them because of what their (own) hands have sent forth, behold, they are in despair!
See they not that God enlarges the provision and restricts it, to whomsoever He pleases? Verily in that are Signs for those who believe.
So give what is due to kindred, the needy, and the wayfarer. That is best for those who seek the Countenance, of God, and it is they who will prosper.
That which ye lay out for increase through the property of (other) people, will have no increase with God: but that which ye lay out for charity, seeking the Countenance of God, (will increase): it is these who will get a recompense multiplied.
It is God Who has created you: further, He has provided for your sustenance; then He will cause you to die; and again He will give you life. Are there any of your (false) "Partners" who can do any single one of these things? Glory to Him! and high is He above the partners they attribute (to him)!
Mischief has appeared on land and sea because of (the meed) that the hands of men have earned, that (God) may give them a taste of some of their deeds: in order that they may turn back (from Evil).
Say: "Travel through the earth and see what was the end of those before (you): Most of them worshipped others besides God."
But set thou thy face to the right Religion before there come from God the Day which there is no chance of averting: on that Day shall men be divided (in two).
Those who reject Faith will suffer from that rejection: and those who work righteousness will spread their couch (of repose) for themselves (in heaven):
That He may reward those who believe and work righteous deeds, out of his Bounty. For He loves not those who reject Faith.
Among His Signs is this, that He sends the Winds, as heralds of Glad Tidings, giving you a taste of His (Grace and) Mercy,- that the ships may sail (majestically) by His Command and that ye may seek of His Bounty: in order that ye may be grateful.
We did indeed send, before thee, apostles to their (respective) peoples, and they came to them with Clear Signs: then, to those who transgressed, We meted out Retribution: and it was due from Us to aid those who believed.
It is God Who sends the Winds, and they raise the Clouds: then does He spread them in the sky as He wills, and break them into fragments, until thou seest rain-drops issue from the midst thereof: then when He has made them reach such of his servants as He wills behold, they do rejoice!-
Even though, before they received (the rain) - just before this - they were dumb with despair!
Then contemplate (O man!) the memorials of God's Mercy!- how He gives life to the earth after its death: verily the same will give life to the men who are dead: for He has power over all things.
And if We (but) send a Wind from which they see (their tilth) turn yellow,- behold, they become, thereafter, Ungrateful (Unbelievers)!
So verily thou canst not make the dead to hear, nor canst thou make the deaf to hear the call, when they show their backs and turn away.
Nor canst thou lead back the blind from their straying: only those wilt thou make to hear, who believe in Our signs and submit (their wills in Islam).
It is God Who created you in a state of (helpless) weakness, then gave (you) strength after weakness, then, after strength, gave (you weakness and a hoary head: He creates as He wills, and it is He Who has all knowledge and power.
On the Day that the Hour (of Reckoning) will be established, the transgressors will swear that they tarried not but an hour: thus were they used to being deluded!
But those endued with knowledge and faith will say: "Indeed ye did tarry, within God's Decree, to the Day of Resurrection, and this is the Day of Resurrection: but ye - ye were not aware!"
So on that Day no excuse of theirs will avail the transgressors, nor will they be invited (then) to seek grace (by repentance).
verily We have propounded for men, in this Qur'an every kind of Parable: But if thou bring to them any Sign, the Unbelievers are sure to say, "Ye do nothing but talk vanities."
Thus does God seal up the hearts of those who understand not.
So patiently persevere: for verily the promise of God is true: nor let those shake thy firmness, who have (themselves) no certainty of faith.
A. L. M.
These are Verses of the Wise Book,-
A Guide and a Mercy to the Doers of Good,-
Those who establish regular Prayer, and give regular Charity, and have (in their hearts) the assurance of the Hereafter.
These are on (true) guidance from their Lord: and these are the ones who will prosper.
But there are, among men, those who purchase idle tales, without knowledge (or meaning), to mislead (men) from the Path of God and throw ridicule (on the Path): for such there will be a Humiliating Penalty.
When Our Signs are rehearsed to such a one, he turns away in arrogance, as if he heard them not, as if there were deafness in both his ears: announce to him a grievous Penalty.
For those who believe and work righteous deeds, there will be Gardens of Bliss,-
To dwell therein. The promise of God is true: and He is Exalted in Power, Wise.
He created the heavens without any pillars that ye can see; He set on the earth mountains standing firm, lest it should shake with you; and He scattered through it beasts of all kinds. We send down rain from the sky, and produce on the earth every kind of noble creature, in pairs.
Such is the Creation of God: now show Me what is there that others besides Him have created: nay, but the Transgressors are in manifest error.
we bestowed (in the past) Wisdom on Luqman: "Show (thy) gratitude to God." Any who is (so) grateful does so to the profit of his own soul: but if any is ungrateful, verily God is free of all wants, Worthy of all praise.
Behold, Luqman said to his son by way of instruction: "O my son! join not in worship (others) with God: for false worship is indeed the highest wrong-doing."
And We have enjoined on man (to be good) to his parents: in travail upon travail did his mother bear him, and in years twain was his weaning: (hear the command), "Show gratitude to Me and to thy parents: to Me is (thy final) Goal.
"But if they strive to make thee join in worship with Me things of which thou hast no knowledge, obey them not; yet bear them company in this life with justice (and consideration), and follow the way of those who turn to me (in love): in the end the return of you all is to Me, and I will tell you the truth (and meaning) of all that ye did."
"O my son!" (said Luqman), "If there be (but) the weight of a mustard-seed and it were (hidden) in a rock, or (anywhere) in the heavens or on earth, God will bring it forth: for God understands the finest mysteries, (and) is well-acquainted (with them).
"O my son! establish regular prayer, enjoin what is just, and forbid what is wrong: and bear with patient constancy whatever betide thee; for this is firmness (of purpose) in (the conduct of) affairs.
"And swell not thy cheek (for pride) at men, nor walk in insolence through the earth; for God loveth not any arrogant boaster.
"And be moderate in thy pace, and lower thy voice; for the harshest of sounds without doubt is the braying of the ass."
Do ye not see that God has subjected to your (use) all things in the heavens and on earth, and has made his bounties flow to you in exceeding measure, (both) seen and unseen? Yet there are among men those who dispute about God, without knowledge and without guidance, and without a Book to enlighten them!
When they are told to follow the (Revelation) that God has sent down, they say: "Nay, we shall follow the ways that we found our fathers (following). "What! even if it is Satan beckoning them to the Penalty of the (Blazing) Fire?
Whoever submits his whole self to God, and is a doer of good, has grasped indeed the most trustworthy hand-hold: and with God rests the End and Decision of (all) affairs.
But if any reject Faith, let not his rejection grieve thee: to Us is their return, and We shall tell them the truth of their deeds: for God knows well all that is in (men's) hearts.
We grant them their pleasure for a little while: in the end shall We drive them to a chastisement unrelenting.
If thou ask them, who it is that created the heavens and the earth. They will certainly say, "God". Say: "Praise be to God!" But most of them understand not.
To God belong all things in heaven and earth: verily God is He (that is) free of all wants, worthy of all praise.
And if all the trees on earth were pens and the ocean (were ink), with seven oceans behind it to add to its (supply), yet would not the words of God be exhausted (in the writing): for God is Exalted in Power, full of Wisdom.
And your creation or your resurrection is in no wise but as an individual soul: for God is He Who hears and sees (all things).
Seest thou not that God merges Night into Day and he merges Day into Night; that He has subjected the sun, and the moon (to his Law), each running its course for a term appointed; and that God is well-acquainted with all that ye do?
That is because God is the (only) Reality, and because whatever else they invoke besides Him is Falsehood; and because God,- He is the Most High, Most Great.
Seest thou not that the ships sail through the ocean by the Grace of God?- that He may show you of His Signs? Verily in this are Signs for all who constantly persevere and give thanks.
When a wave covers them like the canopy (of clouds), they call to God, offering Him sincere devotion. But when He has delivered them safely to land, there are among them those that halt between (right and wrong). But none reject Our Signs except only a perfidious ungrateful (wretch)!
O mankind! do your duty to your Lord, and fear (the coming of) a Day when no father can avail aught for his son, nor a son avail aught for his father. Verily, the promise of God is true: let not then this present life deceive you, nor let the chief Deceiver deceive you about God.
Verily the knowledge of the Hour is with God (alone). It is He Who sends down rain, and He Who knows what is in the wombs. Nor does any one know what it is that he will earn on the morrow: Nor does any one know in what land he is to die. Verily with God is full knowledge and He is acquainted (with all things).
A. L. M.
(This is) the Revelation of the Book in which there is no doubt,- from the Lord of the Worlds.
Or do they say, "He has forged it"? Nay, it is the Truth from thy Lord, that thou mayest admonish a people to whom no warner has come before thee: in order that they may receive guidance.
It is God Who has created the heavens and the earth, and all between them, in six Days, and is firmly established on the Throne (of Authority): ye have none, besides Him, to protect or intercede (for you): will ye not then receive admonition?
He rules (all) affairs from the heavens to the earth: in the end will (all affairs) go up to Him, on a Day, the space whereof will be (as) a thousand years of your reckoning.
Such is He, the Knower of all things, hidden and open, the Exalted (in power), the Merciful;-
He Who has made everything which He has created most good: He began the creation of man with (nothing more than) clay,
And made his progeny from a quintessence of the nature of a fluid despised:
But He fashioned him in due proportion, and breathed into him something of His spirit. And He gave you (the faculties of) hearing and sight and feeling (and understanding): little thanks do ye give!
And they say: "What! when we lie, hidden and lost, in the earth, shall we indeed be in a Creation renewed? Nay, they deny the Meeting with their Lord.
Say: "The Angel of Death, put in charge of you, will (duly) take your souls: then shall ye be brought back to your Lord."
If only thou couldst see when the guilty ones will bend low their heads before their Lord, (saying:) "Our Lord! We have seen and we have heard: Now then send us back (to the world): we will work righteousness: for we do indeed (now) believe."
If We had so willed, We could certainly have brought every soul its true guidance: but the Word from Me will come true, "I will fill Hell with Jinns and men all together."
"Taste ye then - for ye forgot the Meeting of this Day of yours, and We too will forget you - taste ye the Penalty of Eternity for your (evil) deeds!"
Only those believe in Our Signs, who, when they are recited to them, fall down in adoration, and celebrate the praises of their Lord, nor are they (ever) puffed up with pride.
Their limbs do forsake their beds of sleep, the while they call on their Lord, in Fear and Hope: and they spend (in charity) out of the sustenance which We have bestowed on them.
Now no person knows what delights of the eye are kept hidden (in reserve) for them - as a reward for their (good) deeds.
Is then the man who believes no better than the man who is rebellious and wicked? Not equal are they.
For those who believe and do righteous deeds are Gardens as hospitable homes, for their (good) deeds.
As to those who are rebellious and wicked, their abode will be the Fire: every time they wish to get away therefrom, they will be forced thereinto, and it will be said to them: "Taste ye the Penalty of the Fire, the which ye were wont to reject as false."
And indeed We will make them taste of the Penalty of this (life) prior to the supreme Penalty, in order that they may (repent and) return.
And who does more wrong than one to whom are recited the Signs of his Lord, and who then turns away therefrom? Verily from those who transgress We shall exact (due) Retribution.
We did indeed aforetime give the Book to Moses: be not then in doubt of its reaching (thee): and We made it a guide to the Children of Israel.
And We appointed, from among them, leaders, giving guidance under Our command, so long as they persevered with patience and continued to have faith in Our Signs.
Verily thy Lord will judge between them on the Day of Judgment, in the matters wherein they differ (among themselves)
Does it not teach them a lesson, how many generations We destroyed before them, in whose dwellings they (now) go to and fro? Verily in that are Signs: Do they not then listen?
And do they not see that We do drive rain to parched soil (bare of herbage), and produce therewith crops, providing food for their cattle and themselves? Have they not the vision?
They say: "When will this decision be, if ye are telling the truth?"
Say: "On the Day of Decision, no profit will it be to Unbelievers if they (then) believe! nor will they be granted a respite."
So turn away from them, and wait: they too are waiting.
O Prophet! Fear God, and hearken not to the Unbelievers and the Hypocrites: verily God is full of Knowledge and Wisdom.
But follow that which comes to thee by inspiration from thy Lord: for God is well acquainted with (all) that ye do.
And put thy trust in God, and enough is God as a disposer of affairs.
God has not made for any man two hearts in his (one) body: nor has He made your wives whom ye divorce by Zihar your mothers: nor has He made your adopted sons your sons. Such is (only) your (manner of) speech by your mouths. But God tells (you) the Truth, and He shows the (right) Way.
Call them by (the names of) their fathers: that is juster in the sight of God. But if ye know not their father's (names, call them) your Brothers in faith, or your maulas. But there is no blame on you if ye make a mistake therein: (what counts is) the intention of your hearts: and God is Oft-Returning, Most Merciful.
The Prophet is closer to the Believers than their own selves, and his wives are their mothers. Blood-relations among each other have closer personal ties, in the Decree of God. Than (the Brotherhood of) Believers and Muhajirs: nevertheless do ye what is just to your closest friends: such is the writing in the Decree (of God).
And remember We took from the prophets their covenant: As (We did) from thee: from Noah, Abraham, Moses, and Jesus the son of Mary: We took from them a solemn covenant:
That (God) may question the (custodians) of Truth concerning the Truth they (were charged with): And He has prepared for the Unbelievers a grievous Penalty.
O ye who believe! Remember the Grace of God, (bestowed) on you, when there came down on you hosts (to overwhelm you): But We sent against them a hurricane and forces that ye saw not: but God sees (clearly) all that ye do.
Behold! they came on you from above you and from below you, and behold, the eyes became dim and the hearts gaped up to the throats, and ye imagined various (vain) thoughts about God!
In that situation were the Believers tried: they were shaken as by a tremendous shaking.
And behold! The Hypocrites and those in whose hearts is a disease (even) say: "God and His Apostle promised us nothing but delusion!"
Behold! A party among them said: "Ye men of Yathrib! ye cannot stand (the attack)! therefore go back!" And a band of them ask for leave of the Prophet, saying, "Truly our houses are bare and exposed," though they were not exposed they intended nothing but to run away.
And if an entry had been effected to them from the sides of the (city), and they had been incited to sedition, they would certainly have brought it to pass, with none but a brief delay!
And yet they had already covenanted with God not to turn their backs, and a covenant with God must (surely) be answered for.
Say: "Running away will not profit you if ye are running away from death or slaughter; and even if (ye do escape), no more than a brief (respite) will ye be allowed to enjoy!"
Say: "Who is it that can screen you from God if it be His wish to give you punishment or to give you Mercy?" Nor will they find for themselves, besides God, any protector or helper.
Verily God knows those among you who keep back (men) and those who say to their brethren, "Come along to us", but come not to the fight except for just a little while.
Covetous over you. Then when fear comes, thou wilt see them looking to thee, their eyes revolving, like (those of) one over whom hovers death: but when the fear is past, they will smite you with sharp tongues, covetous of goods. Such men have no faith, and so God has made their deeds of none effect: and that is easy for God.
They think that the Confederates have not withdrawn; and if the Confederates should come (again), they would wish they were in the deserts (wandering) among the Bedouins, and seeking news about you (from a safe distance); and if they were in your midst, they would fight but little.
Ye have indeed in the Apostle of God a beautiful pattern (of conduct) for any one whose hope is in God and the Final Day, and who engages much in the Praise of God.
When the Believers saw the Confederate forces, they said: "This is what God and his Apostle had promised us, and God and His Apostle told us what was true." And it only added to their faith and their zeal in obedience.
Among the Believers are men who have been true to their covenant with God: of them some have completed their vow (to the extreme), and some (still) wait: but they have never changed (their determination) in the least:
That God may reward the men of Truth for their Truth, and punish the Hypocrites if that be His Will, or turn to them in Mercy: for God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
And God turned back the Unbelievers for (all) their fury: no advantage did they gain; and enough is God for the believers in their fight. And God is full of Strength, able to enforce His Will.
And those of the People of the Book who aided them - God did take them down from their strongholds and cast terror into their hearts. (So that) some ye slew, and some ye made prisoners.
And He made you heirs of their lands, their houses, and their goods, and of a land which ye had not frequented (before). And God has power over all things.
O Prophet! Say to thy Consorts: "If it be that ye desire the life of this World, and its glitter,- then come! I will provide for your enjoyment and set you free in a handsome manner.
But if ye seek God and His Apostle, and the Home of the Hereafter, verily God has prepared for the well-doers amongst you a great reward.
O Consorts of the Prophet! If any of you were guilty of evident unseemly conduct, the Punishment would be doubled to her, and that is easy for God.
But any of you that is devout in the service of God and His Apostle, and works righteousness,- to her shall We grant her reward twice: and We have prepared for her a generous Sustenance.
O Consorts of the Prophet! Ye are not like any of the (other) women: if ye do fear (God), be not too complacent of speech, lest one in whose heart is a disease should be moved with desire: but speak ye a speech (that is) just.
And stay quietly in your houses, and make not a dazzling display, like that of the former Times of Ignorance; and establish regular Prayer, and give regular Charity; and obey God and His Apostle. And God only wishes to remove all abomination from you, ye members of the Family, and to make you pure and spotless.
And recite what is rehearsed to you in your homes, of the Signs of God and His Wisdom: for God understands the finest mysteries and is well-acquainted (with them).
For Muslim men and women,- for believing men and women, for devout men and women, for true men and women, for men and women who are patient and constant, for men and women who humble themselves, for men and women who give in Charity, for men and women who fast (and deny themselves), for men and women who guard their chastity, and for men and women who engage much in God's praise,- for them has God prepared forgiveness and great reward.
It is not fitting for a Believer, man or woman, when a matter has been decided by God and His Apostle to have any option about their decision: if any one disobeys God and His Apostle, he is indeed on a clearly wrong Path.
Behold! Thou didst say to one who had received the grace of God and thy favour: "Retain thou (in wedlock) thy wife, and fear God." But thou didst hide in thy heart that which God was about to make manifest: thou didst fear the people, but it is more fitting that thou shouldst fear God. Then when Zaid had dissolved (his marriage) with her, with the necessary (formality), We joined her in marriage to thee: in order that (in future) there may be no difficulty to the Believers in (the matter of) marriage with the wives of their adopted sons, when the latter have dissolved with the necessary (formality) (their marriage) with them. And God's command must be fulfilled.
There can be no difficulty to the Prophet in what God has indicated to him as a duty. It was the practice (approved) of God amongst those of old that have passed away. And the command of God is a decree determined.
(It is the practice of those) who preach the Messages of God, and fear Him, and fear none but God. And enough is God to call (men) to account.
Muhammad is not the father of any of your men, but (he is) the Apostle of God, and the Seal of the Prophets: and God has full knowledge of all things.
O ye who believe! Celebrate the praises of God, and do this often;
And glorify Him morning and evening.
He it is Who sends blessings on you, as do His angels, that He may bring you out from the depths of Darkness into Light: and He is Full of Mercy to the Believers.
Their salutation on the Day they meet Him will be "Peace!"; and He has prepared for them a generous Reward.
O Prophet! Truly We have sent thee as a Witness, a Bearer of Glad Tidings, and Warner,-
And as one who invites to God's (grace) by His leave, and as a lamp spreading light.
Then give the Glad Tidings to the Believers, that they shall have from God a very great Bounty.
And obey not (the behests) of the Unbelievers and the Hypocrites, and heed not their annoyances, but put thy Trust in God. For enough is God as a Disposer of affairs.
O ye who believe! When ye marry believing women, and then divorce them before ye have touched them, no period of 'Iddat have ye to count in respect of them: so give them a present. And set them free in a handsome manner.
O Prophet! We have made lawful to thee thy wives to whom thou hast paid their dowers; and those whom thy right hand possesses out of the prisoners of war whom God has assigned to thee; and daughters of thy paternal uncles and aunts, and daughters of thy maternal uncles and aunts, who migrated (from Makka) with thee; and any believing woman who dedicates her soul to the Prophet if the Prophet wishes to wed her;- this only for thee, and not for the Believers (at large); We know what We have appointed for them as to their wives and the captives whom their right hands possess;- in order that there should be no difficulty for thee. And God is Oft- Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Thou mayest defer (the turn of) any of them that thou pleasest, and thou mayest receive any thou pleasest: and there is no blame on thee if thou invite one whose (turn) thou hadst set aside. This were nigher to the cooling of their eyes, the prevention of their grief, and their satisfaction - that of all of them - with that which thou hast to give them: and God knows (all) that is in your hearts: and God is All- Knowing, Most Forbearing.
It is not lawful for thee (to marry more) women after this, nor to change them for (other) wives, even though their beauty attract thee, except any thy right hand should possess (as handmaidens): and God doth watch over all things.
O ye who believe! Enter not the Prophet's houses,- until leave is given you,- for a meal, (and then) not (so early as) to wait for its preparation: but when ye are invited, enter; and when ye have taken your meal, disperse, without seeking familiar talk. Such (behaviour) annoys the Prophet: he is ashamed to dismiss you, but God is not ashamed (to tell you) the truth. And when ye ask (his ladies) for anything ye want, ask them from before a screen: that makes for greater purity for your hearts and for theirs. Nor is it right for you that ye should annoy God's Apostle, or that ye should marry his widows after him at any time. Truly such a thing is in God's sight an enormity.
Whether ye reveal anything or conceal it, verily God has full knowledge of all things.
There is no blame (on these ladies if they appear) before their fathers or their sons, their brothers, or their brother's sons, or their sisters' sons, or their women, or the (slaves) whom their right hands possess. And, (ladies), fear God; for God is Witness to all things.
God and His angels send blessings on the Prophet: O ye that believe! Send ye blessings on him, and salute him with all respect.
Those who annoy God and His Apostle - God has cursed them in this World and in the Hereafter, and has prepared for them a humiliating Punishment.
And those who annoy believing men and women undeservedly, bear (on themselves) a calumny and a glaring sin.
O Prophet! Tell thy wives and daughters, and the believing women, that they should cast their outer garments over their persons (when abroad): that is most convenient, that they should be known (as such) and not molested. And God is Oft- Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Truly, if the Hypocrites, and those in whose hearts is a disease, and those who stir up sedition in the City, desist not, We shall certainly stir thee up against them: Then will they not be able to stay in it as thy neighbours for any length of time:
They shall have a curse on them: whenever they are found, they shall be seized and slain (without mercy).
(Such was) the practice (approved) of God among those who lived aforetime: No change wilt thou find in the practice (approved) of God.
Men ask thee concerning the Hour: Say, "The knowledge thereof is with God (alone)": and what will make thee understand?- perchance the Hour is nigh!
Verily God has cursed the Unbelievers and prepared for them a Blazing Fire,-
To dwell therein for ever: no protector will they find, nor helper.
The Day that their faces will be turned upside down in the Fire, they will say: "Woe to us! Would that we had obeyed God and obeyed the Apostle!"
And they would say: "Our Lord! We obeyed our chiefs and our great ones, and they misled us as to the (right) Path.
"Our Lord! Give them double Penalty and curse them with a very great Curse!"
O ye who believe! Be ye not like those who vexed and insulted Moses, but God cleared him of the (calumnies) they had uttered: and he was honourable in God's sight.
O ye who believe! Fear God, and (always) say a word directed to the Right:
That He may make your conduct whole and sound and forgive you your sins: He that obeys God and His Apostle, has already attained the highest achievement.
We did indeed offer the Trust to the Heavens and the Earth and the Mountains; but they refused to undertake it, being afraid thereof: but man undertook it;- He was indeed unjust and foolish;-
(With the result) that God has to punish the Hypocrites, men and women, and the Unbelievers, men and women, and God turns in Mercy to the Believers, men and women: for God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Praise be to God, to Whom belong all things in the heavens and on earth: to Him be Praise in the Hereafter: and He is Full of Wisdom, acquainted with all things.
He knows all that goes into the earth, and all that comes out thereof; all that comes down from the sky and all that ascends thereto and He is the Most Merciful, the Oft-Forgiving.
The Unbelievers say, "Never to us will come the Hour": Say, "Nay! but most surely, by my Lord, it will come upon you;- by Him Who knows the unseen,- from Whom is not hidden the least little atom in the heavens or on earth: Nor is there anything less than that, or greater, but is in the Record Perspicuous:
That He may reward those who believe and work deeds of righteousness: for such is Forgiveness and a Sustenance Most Generous."
But those who strive against Our Signs, to frustrate them,- for such will be a Penalty,- a Punishment most humiliating.
And those to whom knowledge has come see that the (Revelation) sent down to thee from thy Lord - that is the Truth, and that it guides to the Path of the Exalted (in might), Worthy of all praise.
The Unbelievers say (in ridicule): "Shall we point out to you a man that will tell you, when ye are all scattered to pieces in disintegration, that ye shall (then be raised) in a New Creation?
"Has he invented a falsehood against God, or has a spirit (seized) him?"- Nay, it is those who believe not in the Hereafter, that are in (real) Penalty, and in farthest error.
See they not what is before them and behind them, of the sky and the earth? If We wished, We could cause the earth to swallow them up, or cause a piece of the sky to fall upon them. Verily in this is a Sign for every devotee that turns to God (in repentance).
We bestowed Grace aforetime on David from ourselves: "O ye Mountains! Sing ye back the Praises of God with him! and ye birds (also)! And We made the iron soft for him;-
(Commanding), "Make thou coast of mail, balancing well the rings of chain armour, and work ye righteousness; for be sure I see (clearly) all that ye do."
And to Solomon (We made) the Wind (obedient): Its early morning (stride) was a month's (journey), and its evening (stride) was a month's (journey); and We made a Font of molten brass to flow for him; and there were Jinns that worked in front of him, by the leave of his Lord, and if any of them turned aside from our command, We made him taste of the Penalty of the Blazing Fire.
They worked for him as he desired, (making) arches, images, basons as large as reservoirs, and (cooking) cauldrons fixed (in their places): "Work ye, sons of David, with thanks! but few of My servants are grateful!"
Then, when We decreed (Solomon's) death, nothing showed them his death except a little worm of the earth, which kept (slowly) gnawing away at his staff: so when he fell down, the Jinns saw plainly that if they had known the unseen, they would not have tarried in the humiliating Penalty (of their Task).
There was, for Saba, aforetime, a Sign in their home-land - two Gardens to the right and to the left. "Eat of the Sustenance (provided) by your Lord, and be grateful to Him: a territory fair and happy, and a Lord Oft-Forgiving!
But they turned away (from God), and We sent against them the Flood (released) from the dams, and We converted their two garden (rows) into "gardens" producing bitter fruit, and tamarisks, and some few (stunted) Lote-trees.
That was the Requital We gave them because they ungratefully rejected Faith: and never do We give (such) requital except to such as are ungrateful rejecters.
Between them and the Cities on which We had poured our blessings, We had placed Cities in prominent positions, and between them We had appointed stages of journey in due proportion: "Travel therein, secure, by night and by day."
But they said: "Our Lord! Place longer distances between our journey- stages": but they wronged themselves (therein). At length We made them as a tale (that is told), and We dispersed them all in scattered fragments. Verily in this are Signs for every (soul that is) patiently constant and grateful.
And on them did Satan prove true his idea, and they followed him, all but a party that believed.
But he had no authority over them,- except that We might test the man who believes in the Hereafter from him who is in doubt concerning it: and thy Lord doth watch over all things.
Say: "Call upon other (gods) whom ye fancy, besides God: They have no power,- not the weight of an atom,- in the heavens or on earth: No (sort of) share have they therein, nor is any of them a helper to God.
"No intercession can avail in His Presence, except for those for whom He has granted permission. So far (is this the case) that, when terror is removed from their hearts (at the Day of Judgment, then) will they say, 'what is it that your Lord commanded?' they will say, 'That which is true and just; and He is the Most High Most Great'."
Say: "Who gives you sustenance, from the heavens and the earth?" Say: "It is God; and certain it is that either we or ye are on right guidance or in manifest error!"
Say: "Ye shall not be questioned as to our sins, nor shall we be questioned as to what ye do."
Say: "Our Lord will gather us together and will in the end decide the matter between us (and you) in truth and justice: and He is the one to decide, the One Who knows all."
Say: "Show me those whom ye have joined with Him as partners: by no means (can ye). Nay, He is God, the Exalted in Power, the Wise."
We have not sent thee but as a universal (Messenger) to men, giving them glad tidings, and warning them (against sin), but most men understand not.
They say: "When will this promise (come to pass) if ye are telling the truth?"
Say: "The appointment to you is for a Day, which ye cannot put back for an hour nor put forward."
The Unbelievers say: "We shall neither believe in this scripture nor in (any) that (came) before it." Couldst thou but see when the wrong-doers will be made to stand before their Lord, throwing back the word (of blame) on one another! Those who had been despised will say to the arrogant ones: "Had it not been for you, we should certainly have been believers!"
The arrogant ones will say to those who had been despised: "Was it we who kept you back from Guidance after it reached you? Nay, rather, it was ye who transgressed.
Those who had been despised will say to the arrogant ones: "Nay! it was a plot (of yours) by day and by night: Behold! Ye (constantly) ordered us to be ungrateful to God and to attribute equals to Him!" They will declare (their) repentance when they see the Penalty: We shall put yokes on the necks of the Unbelievers: It would only be a requital for their (ill) Deeds.
Never did We send a warner to a population, but the wealthy ones among them said: "We believe not in the (Message) with which ye have been sent."
They said: "We have more in wealth and in sons, and we cannot be punished."
Say: "Verily my Lord enlarges and restricts the Provision to whom He pleases, but most men understand not."
It is not your wealth nor your sons, that will bring you nearer to Us in degree: but only those who believe and work righteousness - these are the ones for whom there is a multiplied Reward for their deeds, while secure they (reside) in the dwellings on high!
Those who strive against Our Signs, to frustrate them, will be given over into Punishment.
Say: "Verily my Lord enlarges and restricts the Sustenance to such of his servants as He pleases: and nothing do ye spend in the least (in His cause) but He replaces it: for He is the Best of those who grant Sustenance.
One Day He will gather them all together, and say to the angels, "Was it you that these men used to worship?"
They will say, "Glory to Thee! our (tie) is with Thee - as Protector - not with them. Nay, but they worshipped the Jinns: most of them believed in them."
So on that Day no power shall they have over each other, for profit or harm: and We shall say to the wrong-doers, "Taste ye the Penalty of the Fire,- the which ye were wont to deny!"
When Our Clear Signs are rehearsed to them, they say, "This is only a man who wishes to hinder you from the (worship) which your fathers practised." And they say, "This is only a falsehood invented!" and the Unbelievers say of the Truth when it comes to them, "This is nothing but evident magic!"
But We had not given them Books which they could study, nor sent apostles to them before thee as Warners.
And their predecessors rejected (the Truth); these have not received a tenth of what We had granted to those: yet when they rejected My apostles, how (terrible) was My rejection (of them)!
Say: "I do admonish you on one point: that ye do stand up before God,- (It may be) in pairs, or (it may be) singly,- and reflect (within yourselves): your Companion is not possessed: he is no less than a warner to you, in face of a terrible Penalty."
Say: "No reward do I ask of you: it is (all) in your interest: my reward is only due from God: And He is witness to all things."
Say: "Verily my Lord doth cast the (mantle of) Truth (over His servants),- He that has full knowledge of (all) that is hidden."
Say: "The Truth has arrived, and Falsehood neither creates anything new, nor restores anything."
Say: "If I am astray, I only stray to the loss of my own soul: but if I receive guidance, it is because of the inspiration of my Lord to me: it is He Who hears all things, and is (ever) near."
If thou couldst but see when they will quake with terror; but then there will be no escape (for them), and they will be seized from a position (quite) near.
And they will say, "We do believe (now) in the (Truth)"; but how could they receive (Faith) from a position (so far off,-
Seeing that they did reject Faith (entirely) before, and that they (continually) cast (slanders) on the unseen from a position far off?
And between them and their desires, is placed a barrier, as was done in the past with their partisans: for they were indeed in suspicious (disquieting) doubt.
Praise be to God, Who created (out of nothing) the heavens and the earth, Who made the angels, messengers with wings,- two, or three, or four (pairs): He adds to Creation as He pleases: for God has power over all things.
What God out of his Mercy doth bestow on mankind there is none can withhold: what He doth withhold, there is none can grant, apart from Him: and He is the Exalted in Power, full of Wisdom.
O men! Call to mind the grace of God unto you! is there a creator, other than God, to give you sustenance from heaven or earth? There is no god but He: how then are ye deluded away from the Truth?
And if they reject thee, so were apostles rejected before thee: to God back for decision all affairs.
O men! Certainly the promise of God is true. Let not then this present life deceive you, nor let the Chief Deceiver deceive you about God.
Verily Satan is an enemy to you: so treat him as an enemy. He only invites his adherents, that they may become Companions of the Blazing Fire.
For those who reject God, is a terrible Penalty: but for those who believe and work righteous deeds, is Forgiveness, and a magnificent Reward.
Is he, then, to whom the evil of his conduct is made alluring, so that he looks upon it as good, (equal to one who is rightly guided)? For God leaves to stray whom He wills, and guides whom He wills. So let not thy soul go out in (vainly) sighing after them: for God knows well all that they do!
It is God Who sends forth the Winds, so that they raise up the Clouds, and We drive them to a land that is dead, and revive the earth therewith after its death: even so (will be) the Resurrection!
If any do seek for glory and power,- to God belong all glory and power. To Him mount up (all) Words of Purity: It is He Who exalts each Deed of Righteousness. Those that lay Plots of Evil,- for them is a Penalty terrible; and the plotting of such will be void (of result).
And God did create you from dust; then from a sperm-drop; then He made you in pairs. And no female conceives, or lays down (her load), but with His knowledge. Nor is a man long-lived granted length of days, nor is a part cut off from his life, but is in a Decree (ordained). All this is easy to God.
Nor are the two bodies of flowing water alike,- the one palatable, sweet, and pleasant to drink, and the other, salt and bitter. Yet from each (kind of water) do ye eat flesh fresh and tender, and ye extract ornaments to wear; and thou seest the ships therein that plough the waves, that ye may seek (thus) of the Bounty of God that ye may be grateful.
He merges Night into Day, and he merges Day into Night, and he has subjected the sun and the moon (to his Law): each one runs its course for a term appointed. Such is God your Lord: to Him belongs all Dominion. And those whom ye invoke besides Him have not the least power.
If ye invoke them, they will not listen to your call, and if they were to listen, they cannot answer your (prayer). On the Day of Judgment they will reject your "Partnership". and none, (O man!) can tell thee (the Truth) like the One Who is acquainted with all things.
O ye men! It is ye that have need of God: but God is the One Free of all wants, worthy of all praise.
If He so pleased, He could blot you out and bring in a New Creation.
Nor is that (at all) difficult for God.
Nor can a bearer of burdens bear another's burdens if one heavily laden should call another to (bear) his load. Not the least portion of it can be carried (by the other). Even though he be nearly related. Thou canst but admonish such as fear their Lord unseen and establish regular Prayer. And whoever purifies himself does so for the benefit of his own soul; and the destination (of all) is to God.
The blind and the seeing are not alike;
Nor are the depths of Darkness and the Light;
Nor are the (chilly) shade and the (genial) heat of the sun:
Nor are alike those that are living and those that are dead. God can make any that He wills to hear; but thou canst not make those to hear who are (buried) in graves.
Thou art no other than a warner.
Verily We have sent thee in truth, as a bearer of glad tidings, and as a warner: and there never was a people, without a warner having lived among them (in the past).
And if they reject thee, so did their predecessors, to whom came their apostles with Clear Signs, Books of dark prophecies, and the Book of Enlightenment.
In the end did I punish those who rejected Faith: and how (terrible) was My rejection (of them)!
Seest thou not that God sends down rain from the sky? With it We then bring out produce of various colours. And in the mountains are tracts white and red, of various shades of colour, and black intense in hue.
And so amongst men and crawling creatures and cattle, are they of various colours. Those truly fear God, among His Servants, who have knowledge: for God is Exalted in Might, Oft-Forgiving.
Those who rehearse the Book of God, establish regular Prayer, and spend (in Charity) out of what We have provided for them, secretly and openly, hope for a commerce that will never fail:
For He will pay them their meed, nay, He will give them (even) more out of His Bounty: for He is Oft-Forgiving, Most Ready to appreciate (service).
That which We have revealed to thee of the Book is the Truth,- confirming what was (revealed) before it: for God is assuredly- with respect to His Servants - well acquainted and Fully Observant.
Then We have given the Book for inheritance to such of Our Servants as We have chosen: but there are among them some who wrong their own souls; some who follow a middle course; and some who are, by God's leave, foremost in good deeds; that is the highest Grace.
Gardens of Eternity will they enter: therein will they be adorned with bracelets of gold and pearls; and their garments there will be of silk.
And they will say: "Praise be to God, Who has removed from us (all) sorrow: for our Lord is indeed Oft-Forgiving Ready to appreciate (service):
"Who has, out of His Bounty, settled us in a Home that will last: no toil nor sense of weariness shall touch us therein."
But those who reject (God) - for them will be the Fire of Hell: No term shall be determined for them, so they should die, nor shall its Penalty be lightened for them. Thus do We reward every ungrateful one!
Therein will they cry aloud (for assistance): "Our Lord! Bring us out: we shall work righteousness, not the (deeds) we used to do!" - "Did We not give you long enough life so that he that would should receive admonition? and (moreover) the warner came to you. So taste ye (the fruits of your deeds): for the wrong-doers there is no helper."
Verily God knows (all) the hidden things of the heavens and the earth: verily He has full knowledge of all that is in (men's) hearts.
He it is That has made you inheritors in the earth: if, then, any do reject (God), their rejection (works) against themselves: their rejection but adds to the odium for the Unbelievers in the sight of their Lord: their rejection but adds to (their own) undoing.
Say: "Have ye seen (these) 'Partners' of yours whom ye call upon besides God? Show Me what it is they have created in the (wide) earth. Or have they a share in the heavens? Or have We given them a Book from which they (can derive) clear (evidence)?- Nay, the wrong-doers promise each other nothing but delusions.
It is God Who sustains the heavens and the earth, lest they cease (to function): and if they should fail, there is none - not one - can sustain them thereafter: Verily He is Most Forbearing, Oft-Forgiving.
They swore their strongest oaths by God that if a warner came to them, they would follow his guidance better than any (other) of the Peoples: But when a warner came to them, it has only increased their flight (from righteousness),-
On account of their arrogance in the land and their plotting of Evil, but the plotting of Evil will hem in only the authors thereof. Now are they but looking for the way the ancients were dealt with? But no change wilt thou find in God's way (of dealing): no turning off wilt thou find in God's way (of dealing).
Do they not travel through the earth, and see what was the End of those before them,- though they were superior to them in strength? Nor is God to be frustrated by anything whatever in the heavens or on earth: for He is All-Knowing. All-Powerful.
If God were to punish men according to what they deserve. He would not leave on the back of the (earth) a single living creature: but He gives them respite for a stated Term: when their Term expires, verily God has in His sight all His Servants.
Ya Sin.
By the Qur'an, full of Wisdom,-
Thou art indeed one of the apostles,
On a Straight Way.
It is a Revelation sent down by (Him), the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
In order that thou mayest admonish a people, whose fathers had received no admonition, and who therefore remain heedless (of the Signs of God).
The Word is proved true against the greater part of them: for they do not believe.
We have put yokes round their necks right up to their chins, so that their heads are forced up (and they cannot see).
And We have put a bar in front of them and a bar behind them, and further, We have covered them up; so that they cannot see.
The same is it to them whether thou admonish them or thou do not admonish them: they will not believe.
Thou canst but admonish such a one as follows the Message and fears the (Lord) Most Gracious, unseen: give such a one, therefore, good tidings, of Forgiveness and a Reward most generous.
Verily We shall give life to the dead, and We record that which they send before and that which they leave behind, and of all things have We taken account in a clear Book (of evidence).
Set forth to them, by way of a parable, the (story of) the Companions of the City. Behold!, there came apostles to it.
When We (first) sent to them two apostles, they rejected them: But We strengthened them with a third: they said, "Truly, we have been sent on a mission to you."
The (people) said: "Ye are only men like ourselves; and (God) Most Gracious sends no sort of revelation: ye do nothing but lie."
They said: "Our Lord doth know that we have been sent on a mission to you:
"And our duty is only to proclaim the clear Message."
The (people) said: "for us, we augur an evil omen from you: if ye desist not, we will certainly stone you. And a grievous punishment indeed will be inflicted on you by us."
They said: "Your evil omens are with yourselves: (deem ye this an evil omen). If ye are admonished? Nay, but ye are a people transgressing all bounds!"
Then there came running, from the farthest part of the City, a man, saying, "O my people! Obey the apostles:
"Obey those who ask no reward of you (for themselves), and who have themselves received Guidance.
"It would not be reasonable in me if I did not serve Him Who created me, and to Whom ye shall (all) be brought back.
"Shall I take (other) gods besides Him? If (God) Most Gracious should intend some adversity for me, of no use whatever will be their intercession for me, nor can they deliver me.
"I would indeed, if I were to do so, be in manifest Error.
"For me, I have faith in the Lord of you (all): listen, then, to me!"
It was said: "Enter thou the Garden." He said: "Ah me! Would that my People knew (what I know)!-
"For that my Lord has granted me Forgiveness and has enrolled me among those held in honour!"
And We sent not down against his People, after him, any hosts from heaven, nor was it needful for Us so to do.
It was no more than a single mighty Blast, and behold! they were (like ashes) quenched and silent.
Ah! Alas for (My) Servants! There comes not an apostle to them but they mock him!
See they not how many generations before them we destroyed? Not to them will they return:
But each one of them all - will be brought before Us (for judgment).
A Sign for them is the earth that is dead: We do give it life, and produce grain therefrom, of which ye do eat.
And We produce therein orchard with date-palms and vines, and We cause springs to gush forth therein:
That they may enjoy the fruits of this (artistry): It was not their hands that made this: will they not then give thanks?
Glory to God, Who created in pairs all things that the earth produces, as well as their own (human) kind and (other) things of which they have no knowledge.
And a Sign for them is the Night: We withdraw therefrom the Day, and behold they are plunged in darkness;
And the sun runs his course for a period determined for him: that is the decree of (Him), the Exalted in Might, the All-Knowing.
And the Moon,- We have measured for her mansions (to traverse) till she returns like the old (and withered) lower part of a date-stalk.
It is not permitted to the Sun to catch up the Moon, nor can the Night outstrip the Day: Each (just) swims along in (its own) orbit (according to Law).
And a Sign for them is that We bore their race (through the Flood) in the loaded Ark;
And We have created for them similar (vessels) on which they ride.
If it were Our Will, We could drown them: then would there be no helper (to hear their cry), nor could they be delivered,
Except by way of Mercy from Us, and by way of (world) convenience (to serve them) for a time.
When they are told, "Fear ye that which is before you and that which will be after you, in order that ye may receive Mercy," (they turn back).
Not a Sign comes to them from among the Signs of their Lord, but they turn away therefrom.
And when they are told, "Spend ye of (the bounties) with which God has provided you," the Unbelievers say to those who believe: "Shall we then feed those whom, if God had so willed, He would have fed, (Himself)?- Ye are in nothing but manifest error."
Further, they say, "When will this promise (come to pass), if what ye say is true?"
They will not (have to) wait for aught but a single Blast: it will seize them while they are yet disputing among themselves!
No (chance) will they then have, by will, to dispose (of their affairs), nor to return to their own people!
The trumpet shall be sounded, when behold! from the sepulchres (men) will rush forth to their Lord!
They will say: "Ah! Woe unto us! Who hath raised us up from our beds of repose?"... (A voice will say:) "This is what (God) Most Gracious had promised. And true was the word of the apostles!"
It will be no more than a single Blast, when lo! they will all be brought up before Us!
Then, on that Day, not a soul will be wronged in the least, and ye shall but be repaid the meeds of your past Deeds.
Verily the Companions of the Garden shall that Day have joy in all that they do;
They and their associates will be in groves of (cool) shade, reclining on Thrones (of dignity);
(Every) fruit (enjoyment) will be there for them; they shall have whatever they call for;
"Peace!" - a word (of salutation) from a Lord Most Merciful!
"And O ye in sin! Get ye apart this Day!
"Did I not enjoin on you, O ye Children of Adam, that ye should not worship Satan; for that he was to you an enemy avowed?-
"And that ye should worship Me, (for that) this was the Straight Way?
"But he did lead astray a great multitude of you. Did ye not, then, understand?
"This is the Hell of which ye were (repeatedly) warned!
"Embrace ye the (fire) this Day, for that ye (persistently) rejected (Truth)."
That Day shall We set a seal on their mouths. But their hands will speak to us, and their feet bear witness, to all that they did.
If it had been our Will, We could surely have blotted out their eyes; then should they have run about groping for the Path, but how could they have seen?
And if it had been Our Will, We could have transformed them (to remain) in their places; then should they have been unable to move about, nor could they have returned (after error).
If We grant long life to any, We cause him to be reversed in nature: Will they not then understand?
We have not instructed the (Prophet) in Poetry, nor is it meet for him: this is no less than a Message and a Qur'an making things clear:
That it may give admonition to any (who are) alive, and that the charge may be proved against those who reject (Truth).
See they not that it is We Who have created for them - among the things which Our hands have fashioned - cattle, which are under their dominion?-
And that We have subjected them to their (use)? of them some do carry them and some they eat:
And they have (other) profits from them (besides), and they get (milk) to drink. Will they not then be grateful?
Yet they take (for worship) gods other than God, (hoping) that they might be helped!
They have not the power to help them: but they will be brought up (before Our Judgment-seat) as a troop (to be condemned).
Let not their speech, then, grieve thee. Verily We know what they hide as well as what they disclose.
Doth not man see that it is We Who created him from sperm? yet behold! he (stands forth) as an open adversary!
And he makes comparisons for Us, and forgets his own (origin and) Creation: He says, "Who can give life to (dry) bones and decomposed ones (at that)?"
Say, "He will give them life Who created them for the first time! for He is Well-versed in every kind of creation!-
"The same Who produces for you fire out of the green tree, when behold! ye kindle therewith (your own fires)!
"Is not He Who created the heavens and the earth able to create the like thereof?" - Yea, indeed! for He is the Creator Supreme, of skill and knowledge (infinite)!
Verily, when He intends a thing, His Command is, "be", and it is!
So glory to Him in Whose hands is the dominion of all things: and to Him will ye be all brought back.
By those who range themselves in ranks,
And so are strong in repelling (evil),
And thus proclaim the Message (of God)!
Verily, verily, your God is one!-
Lord of the heavens and of the earth and all between them, and Lord of every point at the rising of the sun!
We have indeed decked the lower heaven with beauty (in) the stars,-
(For beauty) and for guard against all obstinate rebellious evil spirits,
(So) they should not strain their ears in the direction of the Exalted Assembly but be cast away from every side,
Repulsed, for they are under a perpetual penalty,
Except such as snatch away something by stealth, and they are pursued by a flaming fire, of piercing brightness.
Just ask their opinion: are they the more difficult to create, or the (other) beings We have created? Them have We created out of a sticky clay!
Truly dost thou marvel, while they ridicule,
And, when they are admonished, pay no heed,-
And, when they see a Sign, turn it to mockery,
And say, "This is nothing but evident sorcery!
"What! when we die, and become dust and bones, shall we (then) be raised up (again)
"And also our fathers of old?"
Say thou: "Yea, and ye shall then be humiliated (on account of your evil)."
Then it will be a single (compelling) cry; and behold, they will begin to see!
They will say, "Ah! Woe to us! This is the Day of Judgment!"
(A voice will say,) "This is the Day of Sorting Out, whose truth ye (once) denied!"
"Bring ye up", it shall be said, "The wrong-doers and their wives, and the things they worshipped-
"Besides God, and lead them to the Way to the (Fierce) Fire!
"But stop them, for they must be asked:
"'What is the matter with you that ye help not each other?'"
Nay, but that day they shall submit (to Judgment);
And they will turn to one another, and question one another.
They will say: "It was ye who used to come to us from the right hand (of power and authority)!"
They will reply: "Nay, ye yourselves had no Faith!
"Nor had we any authority over you. Nay, it was ye who were a people in obstinate rebellion!
"So now has been proved true, against us, the word of our Lord that we shall indeed (have to) taste (the punishment of our sins).
"We led you astray: for truly we were ourselves astray."
Truly, that Day, they will (all) share in the Penalty.
Verily that is how We shall deal with Sinners.
For they, when they were told that there is no god except God, would puff themselves up with Pride,
And say: "What! shall we give up our gods for the sake of a Poet possessed?"
Nay! he has come with the (very) Truth, and he confirms (the Message of) the apostles (before him).
Ye shall indeed taste of the Grievous Penalty;-
But it will be no more than the retribution of (the Evil) that ye have wrought;-
But the sincere (and devoted) Servants of God,-
For them is a Sustenance determined,
Fruits (Delights); and they (shall enjoy) honour and dignity,
In Gardens of Felicity,
Facing each other on Thrones (of Dignity):
Round will be passed to them a Cup from a clear-flowing fountain,
Crystal-white, of a taste delicious to those who drink (thereof),
Free from headiness; nor will they suffer intoxication therefrom.
And besides them will be chaste women, restraining their glances, with big eyes (of wonder and beauty).
As if they were (delicate) eggs closely guarded.
Then they will turn to one another and question one another.
One of them will start the talk and say: "I had an intimate companion (on the earth),
"Who used to say, 'what! art thou amongst those who bear witness to the Truth (of the Message)?
"'When we die and become dust and bones, shall we indeed receive rewards and punishments?'"
(A voice) said: "Would ye like to look down?"
He looked down and saw him in the midst of the Fire.
He said: "By God! thou wast little short of bringing me to perdition!
"Had it not been for the Grace of my Lord, I should certainly have been among those brought (there)!
"Is it (the case) that we shall not die,
"Except our first death, and that we shall not be punished?"
Verily this is the supreme achievement!
For the like of this let all strive, who wish to strive.
Is that the better entertainment or the Tree of Zaqqum?
For We have truly made it (as) a trial for the wrong-doers.
For it is a tree that springs out of the bottom of Hell-Fire:
The shoots of its fruit-stalks are like the heads of devils:
Truly they will eat thereof and fill their bellies therewith.
Then on top of that they will be given a mixture made of boiling water.
Then shall their return be to the (Blazing) Fire.
Truly they found their fathers on the wrong Path;
So they (too) were rushed down on their footsteps!
And truly before them, many of the ancients went astray;-
But We sent aforetime, among them, (apostles) to admonish them;-
Then see what was the end of those who were admonished (but heeded not),-
Except the sincere (and devoted) Servants of God.
(In the days of old), Noah cried to Us, and We are the best to hear prayer.
And We delivered him and his people from the Great Calamity,
And made his progeny to endure (on this earth);
And We left (this blessing) for him among generations to come in later times:
"Peace and salutation to Noah among the nations!"
Thus indeed do we reward those who do right.
For he was one of our believing Servants.
Then the rest we overwhelmed in the Flood.
Verily among those who followed his Way was Abraham.
Behold! he approached his Lord with a sound heart.
Behold! he said to his father and to his people, "What is that which ye worship?
"Is it a falsehood- gods other than God- that ye desire?
"Then what is your idea about the Lord of the worlds?"
Then did he cast a glance at the Stars.
And he said, "I am indeed sick (at heart)!"
So they turned away from him, and departed.
Then did he turn to their gods and said, "will ye not eat (of the offerings before you)?...
"What is the matter with you that ye speak not (intelligently)?"
Then did he turn upon them, striking (them) with the right hand.
Then came (the worshippers) with hurried steps, and faced (him).
He said: "Worship ye that which ye have (yourselves) carved?
"But God has created you and your handwork!"
They said, "Build him a furnace, and throw him into the blazing fire!"
(This failing), they then sought a stratagem against him, but We made them the ones most humiliated!
He said: "I will go to my Lord! He will surely guide me!
"O my Lord! Grant me a righteous (son)!"
So We gave him the good news of a boy ready to suffer and forbear.
Then, when (the son) reached (the age of) (serious) work with him, he said: "O my son! I see in vision that I offer thee in sacrifice: Now see what is thy view!" (The son) said: "O my father! Do as thou art commanded: thou will find me, if God so wills one practising Patience and Constancy!"
So when they had both submitted their wills (to God), and he had laid him prostrate on his forehead (for sacrifice),
We called out to him "O Abraham!
"Thou hast already fulfilled the vision!" - thus indeed do We reward those who do right.
For this was obviously a trial-
And We ransomed him with a momentous sacrifice:
And We left (this blessing) for him among generations (to come) in later times:
"Peace and salutation to Abraham!"
Thus indeed do We reward those who do right.
For he was one of our believing Servants.
And We gave him the good news of Isaac - a prophet,- one of the Righteous.
We blessed him and Isaac: but of their progeny are (some) that do right, and (some) that obviously do wrong, to their own souls.
Again (of old) We bestowed Our favour on Moses and Aaron,
And We delivered them and their people from (their) Great Calamity;
And We helped them, so they overcame (their troubles);
And We gave them the Book which helps to make things clear;
And We guided them to the Straight Way.
And We left (this blessing) for them among generations (to come) in later times:
"Peace and salutation to Moses and Aaron!"
Thus indeed do We reward those who do right.
For they were two of our believing Servants.
So also was Elias among those sent (by Us).
Behold, he said to his people, "Will ye not fear (God)?
"Will ye call upon Baal and forsake the Best of Creators,-
"God, your Lord and Cherisher and the Lord and Cherisher of your fathers of old?"
But they rejected him, and they will certainly be called up (for punishment),-
Except the sincere and devoted Servants of God (among them).
And We left (this blessing) for him among generations (to come) in later times:
"Peace and salutation to such as Elias!"
Thus indeed do We reward those who do right.
For he was one of our believing Servants.
So also was Lut among those sent (by Us).
Behold, We delivered him and his adherents, all
Except an old woman who was among those who lagged behind:
Then We destroyed the rest.
Verily, ye pass by their (sites), by day-
And by night: will ye not understand?
So also was Jonah among those sent (by Us).
When he ran away (like a slave from captivity) to the ship (fully) laden,
He (agreed to) cast lots, and he was condemned:
Then the big Fish did swallow him, and he had done acts worthy of blame.
Had it not been that he (repented and) glorified God,
He would certainly have remained inside the Fish till the Day of Resurrection.
But We cast him forth on the naked shore in a state of sickness,
And We caused to grow, over him, a spreading plant of the gourd kind.
And We sent him (on a mission) to a hundred thousand (men) or more.
And they believed; so We permitted them to enjoy (their life) for a while.
Now ask them their opinion: Is it that thy Lord has (only) daughters, and they have sons?-
Or that We created the angels female, and they are witnesses (thereto)?
Is it not that they say, from their own invention,
"God has begotten children"? but they are liars!
Did He (then) choose daughters rather than sons?
What is the matter with you? How judge ye?
Will ye not then receive admonition?
Or have ye an authority manifest?
Then bring ye your Book (of authority) if ye be truthful!
And they have invented a blood-relationship between Him and the Jinns: but the Jinns know (quite well) that they have indeed to appear (before his Judgment- Seat)!
Glory to God! (He is free) from the things they ascribe (to Him)!
Not (so do) the Servants of God, sincere and devoted.
For, verily, neither ye nor those ye worship-
Can lead (any) into temptation concerning God,
Except such as are (themselves) going to the blazing Fire!
(Those ranged in ranks say): "Not one of us but has a place appointed;
"And we are verily ranged in ranks (for service);
"And we are verily those who declare (God's) glory!"
And there were those who said,
"If only we had had before us a Message from those of old,
"We should certainly have been Servants of God, sincere (and devoted)!"
But (now that the Qur'an has come), they reject it: But soon will they know!
Already has Our Word been passed before (this) to our Servants sent (by Us),
That they would certainly be assisted,
And that Our forces,- they surely must conquer.
So turn thou away from them for a little while,
And watch them (how they fare), and they soon shall see (how thou farest)!
Do they wish (indeed) to hurry on our Punishment?
But when it descends into the open space before them, evil will be the morning for those who were warned (and heeded not)!
So turn thou away from them for a little while,
And watch (how they fare) and they soon shall see (how thou farest)!
Glory to thy Lord, the Lord of Honour and Power! (He is free) from what they ascribe (to Him)!
And Peace on the apostles!
And Praise to God, the Lord and Cherisher of the Worlds.
Sad: By the Qur'an, Full of Admonition: (This is the Truth).
But the Unbelievers (are steeped) in self-glory and Separatism.
How many generations before them did We destroy? In the end they cried (for mercy)- when there was no longer time for being saved!
So they wonder that a Warner has come to them from among themselves! and the Unbelievers say, "This is a sorcerer telling lies!
"Has he made the gods (all) into one God? Truly this is a wonderful thing!"
And the leader among them go away (impatiently), (saying), "Walk ye away, and remain constant to your gods! For this is truly a thing designed (against you)!
"We never heard (the like) of this among the people of these latter days: this is nothing but a made-up tale!"
"What! has the Message been sent to him - (Of all persons) among us?"...but they are in doubt concerning My (Own) Message! Nay, they have not yet tasted My Punishment!
Or have they the treasures of the mercy of thy Lord,- the Exalted in Power, the Grantor of Bounties without measure?
Or have they the dominion of the heavens and the earth and all between? If so, let them mount up with the ropes and means (to reach that end)!
But there - will be put to flight even a host of confederates.
Before them (were many who) rejected apostles,- the people of Noah, and 'Ad, and Pharaoh, the Lord of Stakes,
And Thamud, and the people of Lut, and the Companions of the Wood; - such were the Confederates.
Not one (of them) but rejected the apostles, but My punishment came justly and inevitably (on them).
These (today) only wait for a single mighty Blast, which (when it comes) will brook no delay.
They say: "Our Lord! hasten to us our sentence (even) before the Day of Account!"
Have patience at what they say, and remember our servant David, the man of strength: for he ever turned (to God).
It was We that made the hills declare, in unison with him, Our Praises, at eventide and at break of day,
And the birds gathered (in assemblies): all with him did turn (to God).
We strengthened his kingdom, and gave him wisdom and sound judgment in speech and decision.
Has the Story of the Disputants reached thee? Behold, they climbed over the wall of the private chamber;
When they entered the presence of David, and he was terrified of them, they said: "Fear not: we are two disputants, one of whom has wronged the other: Decide now between us with truth, and treat us not with injustice, but guide us to the even Path..
"This man is my brother: He has nine and ninety ewes, and I have (but) one: Yet he says, 'commit her to my care,' and is (moreover) harsh to me in speech."
(David) said: "He has undoubtedly wronged thee in demanding thy (single) ewe to be added to his (flock of) ewes: truly many are the partners (in business) who wrong each other: Not so do those who believe and work deeds of righteousness, and how few are they?"...and David gathered that We had tried him: he asked forgiveness of his Lord, fell down, bowing (in prostration), and turned (to God in repentance).
So We forgave him this (lapse): he enjoyed, indeed, a Near Approach to Us, and a beautiful place of (Final) Return.
O David! We did indeed make thee a vicegerent on earth: so judge thou between men in truth (and justice): Nor follow thou the lusts (of thy heart), for they will mislead thee from the Path of God: for those who wander astray from the Path of God, is a Penalty Grievous, for that they forget the Day of Account.
Not without purpose did We create heaven and earth and all between! that were the thought of Unbelievers! but woe to the Unbelievers because of the Fire (of Hell)!
Shall We treat those who believe and work deeds of righteousness, the same as those who do mischief on earth? Shall We treat those who guard against evil, the same as those who turn aside from the right?
(Here is) a Book which We have sent down unto thee, full of blessings, that they may mediate on its Signs, and that men of understanding may receive admonition.
To David We gave Solomon (for a son),- How excellent in Our service! Ever did he turn (to Us)!
Behold, there were brought before him, at eventide coursers of the highest breeding, and swift of foot;
And he said, "Truly do I love the love of good, with a view to the glory of my Lord,"- until (the sun) was hidden in the veil (of night):
"Bring them back to me." then began he to pass his hand over (their) legs and their necks.
And We did try Solomon: We placed on his throne a body (without life); but he did turn (to Us in true devotion):
He said, "O my Lord! Forgive me, and grant me a kingdom which, (it may be), suits not another after me: for Thou art the Grantor of Bounties (without measure).
Then We subjected the wind to his power, to flow gently to his order, Whithersoever he willed,-
As also the evil ones, (including) every kind of builder and diver,-
As also others bound together in fetters.
"Such are Our Bounties: whether thou bestow them (on others) or withhold them, no account will be asked."
And he enjoyed, indeed, a Near Approach to Us, and a beautiful Place of (Final) Return.
Commemorate Our Servant Job. Behold he cried to his Lord: "The Evil One has afflicted me with distress and suffering!"
(The command was given:) "Strike with thy foot: here is (water) wherein to wash, cool and refreshing, and (water) to drink."
And We gave him (back) his people, and doubled their number,- as a Grace from Ourselves, and a thing for commemoration, for all who have Understanding.
"And take in thy hand a little grass, and strike therewith: and break not (thy oath)." Truly We found him full of patience and constancy. How excellent in Our service! ever did he turn (to Us)!
And commemorate Our Servants Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, possessors of Power and Vision.
Verily We did choose them for a special (purpose)- proclaiming the Message of the Hereafter.
They were, in Our sight, truly, of the company of the Elect and the Good.
And commemorate Isma'il, Elisha, and Zul-Kifl: Each of them was of the Company of the Good.
This is a Message (of admonition): and verily, for the righteous, is a beautiful Place of (Final) Return,-
Gardens of Eternity, whose doors will (ever) be open to them;
Therein will they recline (at ease): Therein can they call (at pleasure) for fruit in abundance, and (delicious) drink;
And beside them will be chaste women restraining their glances, (companions) of equal age.
Such is the Promise made, to you for the Day of Account!
Truly such will be Our Bounty (to you); it will never fail;-
Yea, such! but - for the wrong-doers will be an evil place of (Final) Return!-
Hell!- they will burn therein, - an evil bed (indeed, to lie on)!-
Yea, such! - then shall they taste it,- a boiling fluid, and a fluid dark, murky, intensely cold!-
And other Penalties of a similar kind, to match them!
Here is a troop rushing headlong with you! No welcome for them! truly, they shall burn in the Fire!
(The followers shall cry to the misleaders:) "Nay, ye (too)! No welcome for you! It is ye who have brought this upon us! Now evil is (this) place to stay in!"
They will say: "Our Lord! whoever brought this upon us,- Add to him a double Penalty in the Fire!"
And they will say: "What has happened to us that we see not men whom we used to number among the bad ones?
"Did we treat them (as such) in ridicule, or have (our) eyes failed to perceive them?"
Truly that is just and fitting,- the mutual recriminations of the People of the Fire!
Say: "Truly am I a Warner: no god is there but the one God, Supreme and Irresistible,-
"The Lord of the heavens and the earth, and all between,- Exalted in Might, able to enforce His Will, forgiving again and again."
Say: "That is a Message Supreme (above all),-
"From which ye do turn away!
"No knowledge have I of the Chiefs on high, when they discuss (matters) among themselves.
'Only this has been revealed to me: that I am to give warning plainly and publicly."
Behold, thy Lord said to the angels: "I am about to create man from clay:
"When I have fashioned him (in due proportion) and breathed into him of My spirit, fall ye down in obeisance unto him."
So the angels prostrated themselves, all of them together:
Not so Iblis: he was haughty, and became one of those who reject Faith.
(God) said: "O Iblis! What prevents thee from prostrating thyself to one whom I have created with my hands? Art thou haughty? Or art thou one of the high (and mighty) ones?"
(Iblis) said: "I am better than he: thou createdst me from fire, and him thou createdst from clay."
(God) said: "Then get thee out from here: for thou art rejected, accursed.
"And My curse shall be on thee till the Day of Judgment."
(Iblis) said: "O my Lord! Give me then respite till the Day the (dead) are raised."
(God) said: "Respite then is granted thee-
"Till the Day of the Time Appointed."
(Iblis) said: "Then, by Thy power, I will put them all in the wrong,-
"Except Thy Servants amongst them, sincere and purified (by Thy Grace)."
(God) said: "Then it is just and fitting- and I say what is just and fitting-
"That I will certainly fill Hell with thee and those that follow thee,- every one."
Say: "No reward do I ask of you for this (Qur'an), nor am I a pretender.
"This is no less than a Message to (all) the Worlds.
"And ye shall certainly know the truth of it (all) after a while."
The revelation of this Book is from God, the Exalted in Power, full of Wisdom.
Verily it is We Who have revealed the Book to thee in Truth: so serve God, offering Him sincere devotion.
Is it not to God that sincere devotion is due? But those who take for protectors other than God (say): "We only serve them in order that they may bring us nearer to God." Truly God will judge between them in that wherein they differ. But God guides not such as are false and ungrateful.
Had God wished to take to Himself a son, He could have chosen whom He pleased out of those whom He doth create: but Glory be to Him! (He is above such things.) He is God, the One, the Irresistible.
He created the heavens and the earth in true (proportions): He makes the Night overlap the Day, and the Day overlap the Night: He has subjected the sun and the moon (to His law): Each one follows a course for a time appointed. Is not He the Exalted in Power - He Who forgives again and again?
He created you (all) from a single person: then created, of like nature, his mate; and he sent down for you eight head of cattle in pairs: He makes you, in the wombs of your mothers, in stages, one after another, in three veils of darkness. such is God, your Lord and Cherisher: to Him belongs (all) dominion. There is no god but He: then how are ye turned away (from your true Centre)?
If ye reject (God), Truly God hath no need of you; but He liketh not ingratitude from His servants: if ye are grateful, He is pleased with you. No bearer of burdens can bear the burden of another. In the end, to your Lord is your Return, when He will tell you the truth of all that ye did (in this life). for He knoweth well all that is in (men's) hearts.
When some trouble toucheth man, he crieth unto his Lord, turning to Him in repentance: but when He bestoweth a favour upon him as from Himself, (man) doth forget what he cried and prayed for before, and he doth set up rivals unto God, thus misleading others from God's Path. Say, "Enjoy thy blasphemy for a little while: verily thou art (one) of the Companions of the Fire!"
Is one who worships devoutly during the hour of the night prostrating himself or standing (in adoration), who takes heed of the Hereafter, and who places his hope in the Mercy of his Lord - (like one who does not)? Say: "Are those equal, those who know and those who do not know? It is those who are endued with understanding that receive admonition.
Say: "O ye my servants who believe! Fear your Lord, good is (the reward) for those who do good in this world. Spacious is God's earth! those who patiently persevere will truly receive a reward without measure!"
Say: "Verily, I am commanded to serve God with sincere devotion;
"And I am commanded to be the first of those who bow to God in Islam."
Say: "I would, if I disobeyed my Lord, indeed have fear of the Penalty of a Mighty Day."
Say: "It is God I serve, with my sincere (and exclusive) devotion:
"Serve ye what ye will besides him." Say: "Truly, those in loss are those who lose their own souls and their People on the Day of Judgment: Ah! that is indeed the (real and) evident Loss!
They shall have Layers of Fire above them, and Layers (of Fire) below them: with this doth God warn off his servants: "O My Servants! then fear ye Me!"
Those who eschew Evil,- and fall not into its worship,- and turn to God (in repentance),- for them is Good News: so announce the Good News to My Servants,-
Those who listen to the Word, and follow the best (meaning) in it: those are the ones whom God has guided, and those are the ones endued with understanding.
Is, then, one against whom the decree of Punishment is justly due (equal to one who eschews Evil)? Wouldst thou, then, deliver one (who is) in the Fire?
But it is for those who fear their Lord. That lofty mansions, one above another, have been built: beneath them flow rivers (of delight): (such is) the Promise of God: never doth God fail in (His) promise.
Seest thou not that God sends down rain from the sky, and leads it through springs in the earth? Then He causes to grow, therewith, produce of various colours: then it withers; thou wilt see it grow yellow; then He makes it dry up and crumble away. Truly, in this, is a Message of remembrance to men of understanding.
Is one whose heart God has opened to Islam, so that he has received Enlightenment from God, (no better than one hard-hearted)? Woe to those whose hearts are hardened against celebrating the praises of God! they are manifestly wandering (in error)!
God has revealed (from time to time) the most beautiful Message in the form of a Book, consistent with itself, (yet) repeating (its teaching in various aspects): the skins of those who fear their Lord tremble thereat; then their skins and their hearts do soften to the celebration of God's praises. Such is the guidance of God: He guides therewith whom He pleases, but such as God leaves to stray, can have none to guide.
Is, then, one who has to fear the brunt of the Penalty on the Day of Judgment (and receive it) on his face, (like one guarded therefrom)? It will be said to the wrong- doers: "Taste ye (the fruits of) what ye earned!"
Those before them (also) rejected (revelation), and so the Punishment came to them from directions they did not perceive.
So God gave them a taste of humiliation in the present life, but greater is the punishment of the Hereafter, if they only knew!
We have put forth for men, in this Qur'an every kind of Parable, in order that they may receive admonition.
(It is) a Qur'an in Arabic, without any crookedness (therein): in order that they may guard against Evil.
God puts forth a Parable a man belonging to many partners at variance with each other, and a man belonging entirely to one master: are those two equal in comparison? Praise be to God! but most of them have no knowledge.
Truly thou wilt die (one day), and truly they (too) will die (one day).
In the end will ye (all), on the Day of Judgment, settle your disputes in the presence of your Lord.
Who, then, doth more wrong than one who utters a lie concerning God, and rejects the Truth when it comes to him; is there not in Hell an abode for blasphemers?
And he who brings the Truth and he who confirms (and supports) it - such are the men who do right.
They shall have all that they wish for, in the presence of their Lord: such is the reward of those who do good:
So that God will turn off from them (even) the worst in their deeds and give them their reward according to the best of what they have done.
Is not God enough for his Servant? But they try to frighten thee with other (gods) besides Him! for such as God leaves to stray, there can be no guide.
And such as God doth guide there can be none to lead astray. Is not God Exalted in Power, (Able to enforce His Will), Lord of Retribution?
If indeed thou ask them who it is that created the heavens and the earth, they would be sure to say, "God". Say: "See ye then? the things that ye invoke besides God,- can they, if God wills some Penalty for me, remove His Penalty?- Or if He wills some Grace for me, can they keep back his Grace?" Say: "Sufficient is God for me! In Him trust those who put their trust."
Say: "O my People! Do whatever ye can: I will do (my part): but soon will ye know-
"Who it is to whom comes a Penalty of ignominy, and on whom descends a Penalty that abides."
Verily We have revealed the Book to thee in Truth, for (instructing) mankind. He, then, that receives guidance benefits his own soul: but he that strays injures his own soul. Nor art thou set over them to dispose of their affairs.
It is God that takes the souls (of men) at death; and those that die not (He takes) during their sleep: those on whom He has passed the decree of death, He keeps back (from returning to life), but the rest He sends (to their bodies) for a term appointed verily in this are Signs for those who reflect.
What! Do they take for intercessors others besides God? Say: "Even if they have no power whatever and no intelligence?"
Say: "To God belongs exclusively (the right to grant) intercession: to Him belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth: In the End, it is to Him that ye shall be brought back."
When God, the One and Only, is mentioned, the hearts of those who believe not in the Hereafter are filled with disgust and horror; but when (gods) other than He are mentioned, behold, they are filled with joy!
Say: "O God! Creator of the heavens and the earth! Knower of all that is hidden and open! it is Thou that wilt judge between Thy Servants in those matters about which they have differed."
Even if the wrong-doers had all that there is on earth, and as much more, (in vain) would they offer it for ransom from the pain of the Penalty on the Day of Judgment: but something will confront them from God, which they could never have counted upon!
For the evils of their Deeds will confront them, and they will be (completely) encircled by that which they used to mock at!
Now, when trouble touches man, he cries to Us: But when We bestow a favour upon him as from Ourselves, he says, "This has been given to me because of a certain knowledge (I have)!" Nay, but this is but a trial, but most of them understand not!
Thus did the (generations) before them say! But all that they did was of no profit to them.
Nay, the evil results of their Deeds overtook them. And the wrong-doers of this (generation)- the evil results of their Deeds will soon overtake them (too), and they will never be able to frustrate (Our Plan)!
Know they not that God enlarges the provision or restricts it, for any He pleases? Verily, in this are Signs for those who believe!
Say: "O my Servants who have transgressed against their souls! Despair not of the Mercy of God: for God forgives all sins: for He is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
"Turn ye to our Lord (in repentance) and bow to His (Will), before the Penalty comes on you: after that ye shall not be helped.
"And follow the best of (the courses) revealed to you from your Lord, before the Penalty comes on you - of a sudden while ye perceive not!-
"Lest the soul should (then) say: 'Ah! Woe is me!- In that I neglected (my duty) towards God, and was but among those who mocked!'-
"Or (lest) it should say: 'If only God had guided me, I should certainly have been among the righteous!'-
"Or (lest) it should say when it (actually) sees the penalty: 'If only I had another chance, I should certainly be among those who do good!'
"(The reply will be:) 'Nay, but there came to thee my Signs, and thou didst reject them: thou wast Haughty, and became one of those who reject faith!'"
On the Day of Judgment wilt thou see those who told lies against God;- their faces will be turned black; Is there not in Hell an abode for the Haughty?
But God will deliver the righteous to their place of salvation: no evil shall touch them, nor shall they grieve.
God is the Creator of all things, and He is the Guardian and Disposer of all affairs.
To Him belong the keys of the heavens and the earth: and those who reject the Signs of God,- it is they who will be in loss.
Say: "Is it some one other than God that ye order me to worship, O ye ignorant ones?"
But it has already been revealed to thee,- as it was to those before thee,- "If thou wert to join (gods with God), truly fruitless will be thy work (in life), and thou wilt surely be in the ranks of those who lose (all spiritual good)".
Nay, but worship God, and be of those who give thanks.
No just estimate have they made of God, such as is due to Him: On the Day of Judgment the whole of the earth will be but His handful, and the heavens will be rolled up in His right hand: Glory to Him! High is He above the Partners they attribute to Him!
The Trumpet will (just) be sounded, when all that are in the heavens and on earth will swoon, except such as it will please God (to exempt). Then will a second one be sounded, when, behold, they will be standing and looking on!
And the Earth will shine with the Glory of its Lord: the Record (of Deeds) will be placed (open); the prophets and the witnesses will be brought forward and a just decision pronounced between them; and they will not be wronged (in the least).
And to every soul will be paid in full (the fruit) of its Deeds; and (God) knoweth best all that they do.
The Unbelievers will be led to Hell in crowd: until, when they arrive, there, its gates will be opened. And its keepers will say, "Did not apostles come to you from among yourselves, rehearsing to you the Signs of your Lord, and warning you of the Meeting of This Day of yours?" The answer will be: "True: but the Decree of Punishment has been proved true against the Unbelievers!"
(To them) will be said: "Enter ye the gates of Hell, to dwell therein: and evil is (this) Abode of the Arrogant!"
And those who feared their Lord will be led to the Garden in crowds: until behold, they arrive there; its gates will be opened; and its keepers will say: "Peace be upon you! well have ye done! enter ye here, to dwell therein."
They will say: "Praise be to God, Who has truly fulfilled His Promise to us, and has given us (this) land in heritage: We can dwell in the Garden as we will: how excellent a reward for those who work (righteousness)!"
And thou wilt see the angels surrounding the Throne (Divine) on all sides, singing Glory and Praise to their Lord. The Decision between them (at Judgment) will be in (perfect) justice, and the cry (on all sides) will be, "Praise be to God, the Lord of the Worlds!"
Ha Mim
The revelation of this Book is from God, Exalted in Power, Full of Knowledge,-
Who forgiveth sin, accepteth repentance, is strict in punishment, and hath a long reach (in all things). there is no god but He: to Him is the final goal.
None can dispute about the Signs of God but the Unbelievers. Let not, then, their strutting about through the land deceive thee!
But (there were people) before them, who denied (the Signs),- the People of Noah, and the Confederates (of Evil) after them; and every People plotted against their prophet, to seize him, and disputed by means of vanities, therewith to condemn the Truth; but it was I that seized them! and how (terrible) was My Requital!
Thus was the Decree of thy Lord proved true against the Unbelievers; that truly they are Companions of the Fire!
Those who sustain the Throne (of God) and those around it Sing Glory and Praise to their Lord; believe in Him; and implore Forgiveness for those who believe: "Our Lord! Thy Reach is over all things, in Mercy and Knowledge. Forgive, then, those who turn in Repentance, and follow Thy Path; and preserve them from the Penalty of the Blazing Fire!
"And grant, our Lord! that they enter the Gardens of Eternity, which Thou hast promised to them, and to the righteous among their fathers, their wives, and their posterity! For Thou art (He), the Exalted in Might, Full of Wisdom.
"And preserve them from (all) ills; and any whom Thou dost preserve from ills that Day,- on them wilt Thou have bestowed Mercy indeed: and that will be truly (for them) the highest Achievement".
The Unbelievers will be addressed: "Greater was the aversion of God to you than (is) your aversion to yourselves, seeing that ye were called to the Faith and ye used to refuse."
They will say: "Our Lord! twice hast Thou made us without life, and twice hast Thou given us Life! Now have we recognised our sins: Is there any way out (of this)?"
(The answer will be:) "This is because, when God was invoked as the Only (object of worship), ye did reject Faith, but when partners were joined to Him, ye believed! the Command is with God, Most High, Most Great!"
He it is Who showeth you his Signs, and sendeth down sustenance for you from the sky: but only those receive admonition who turn (to God).
Call ye, then, upon God with sincere devotion to Him, even though the Unbelievers may detest it.
Raised high above ranks (or degrees), (He is) the Lord of the Throne (of Authority): by His Command doth He send the Spirit (of inspiration) to any of His servants he pleases, that it may warn (men) of the Day of Mutual Meeting,-
The Day whereon they will (all) come forth: not a single thing concerning them is hidden from God. Whose will be the dominion that Day?" That of God, the One the Irresistible!
That Day will every soul be requited for what it earned; no injustice will there be that Day, for God is Swift in taking account.
Warn them of the Day that is (ever) drawing near, when the hearts will (come) right up to the throats to choke (them); No intimate friend nor intercessor will the wrong-doers have, who could be listened to.
(God) knows of (the tricks) that deceive with the eyes, and all that the hearts (of men) conceal.
And God will judge with (justice and) Truth: but those whom (men) invoke besides Him, will not (be in a position) to judge at all. Verily it is God (alone) Who hears and sees (all things).
Do they not travel through the earth and see what was the End of those before them? They were even superior to them in strength, and in the traces (they have left) in the land: but God did call them to account for their sins, and none had they to defend them against God.
That was because there came to them their apostles with Clear (Signs), but they rejected them: So God called them to account: for He is Full of Strength, Strict in Punishment.
Of old We sent Moses, with Our Signs and an authority manifest,
To Pharaoh, Haman, and Qarun; but they called (him)" a sorcerer telling lies!"...
Now, when he came to them in Truth, from Us, they said, "Slay the sons of those who believe with him, and keep alive their females," but the plots of Unbelievers (end) in nothing but errors (and delusions)!...
Said Pharaoh: "Leave me to slay Moses; and let him call on his Lord! What I fear is lest he should change your religion, or lest he should cause mischief to appear in the land!"
Moses said: "I have indeed called upon my Lord and your Lord (for protection) from every arrogant one who believes not in the Day of Account!"
A believer, a man from among the people of Pharaoh, who had concealed his faith, said: "Will ye slay a man because he says, 'My Lord is God'?- when he has indeed come to you with Clear (Signs) from your Lord? and if he be a liar, on him is (the sin of) his lie: but, if he is telling the Truth, then will fall on you something of the (calamity) of which he warns you: Truly God guides not one who transgresses and lies!
"O my People! Yours is the dominion this day: Ye have the upper hand in the land: but who will help us from the Punishment of God, should it befall us?" Pharaoh said: "I but point out to you that which I see (myself); Nor do I guide you but to the Path of Right!"
Then said the man who believed: "O my people! Truly I do fear for you something like the Day (of disaster) of the Confederates (in sin)!-
"Something like the fate of the People of Noah, the 'Ad, and the Thamud, and those who came after them: but God never wishes injustice to his Servants.
"And O my people! I fear for you a Day when there will be Mutual calling (and wailing),-
"A Day when ye shall turn your backs and flee: No defender shall ye have from God: Any whom God leaves to stray, there is none to guide...
"And to you there came Joseph in times gone by, with Clear Signs, but ye ceased not to doubt of the (Mission) for which he had come: At length, when he died, ye said: 'No apostle will God send after him.' thus doth God leave to stray such as transgress and live in doubt,-
"(Such) as dispute about the Signs of God, without any authority that hath reached them, grievous and odious (is such conduct) in the sight of God and of the Believers. Thus doth God, seal up every heart - of arrogant and obstinate Transgressors."
Pharaoh said: "O Haman! Build me a lofty palace, that I may attain the ways and means-
"The ways and means of (reaching) the heavens, and that I may mount up to the God of Moses: But as far as I am concerned, I think (Moses) is a liar!" Thus was made alluring, in Pharaoh's eyes, the evil of his deeds, and he was hindered from the Path; and the plot of Pharaoh led to nothing but perdition (for him).
The man who believed said further: "O my people! Follow me: I will lead you to the Path of Right.
"O my people! This life of the present is nothing but (temporary) convenience: It is the Hereafter that is the Home that will last.
"He that works evil will not be requited but by the like thereof: and he that works a righteous deed - whether man or woman - and is a Believer- such will enter the Garden (of Bliss): Therein will they have abundance without measure.
"And O my people! How (strange) it is for me to call you to Salvation while ye call me to the Fire!
"Ye do call upon me to blaspheme against God, and to join with Him partners of whom I have no knowledge; and I call you to the Exalted in Power, Who forgives again and again!"
"Without doubt ye do call me to one who is not fit to be called to, whether in this world, or in the Hereafter; our return will be to God; and the Transgressors will be Companions of the Fire!
"Soon will ye remember what I say to you (now), My (own) affair I commit to God: for God (ever) watches over His Servants."
Then God saved him from (every) ill that they plotted (against him), but the burnt of the Penalty encompassed on all sides the People of Pharaoh.
In front of the Fire will they be brought, morning and evening: And (the sentence will be) on the Day that Judgment will be established: "Cast ye the People of Pharaoh into the severest Penalty!"
Behold, they will dispute with each other in the Fire! The weak ones (who followed) will say to those who had been arrogant, "We but followed you: Can ye then take (on yourselves) from us some share of the Fire?
Those who had been arrogant will say: "We are all in this (Fire)! Truly, God has judged between (his) Servants!"
Those in the Fire will say to the Keepers of Hell: "Pray to your Lord to lighten us the Penalty for a day (at least)!"
They will say: "Did there not come to you your apostles with Clear Signs?" They will say, "Yes". They will reply, "Then pray (as ye like)! But the prayer of those without Faith is nothing but (futile wandering) in (mazes of) error!"
We will, without doubt, help our apostles and those who believe, (both) in this world's life and on the Day when the Witnesses will stand forth,-
The Day when no profit will it be to Wrong-doers to present their excuses, but they will (only) have the Curse and the Home of Misery.
We did aforetime give Moses the (Book of) Guidance, and We gave the book in inheritance to the Children of Israel,-
A Guide and a Message to men of Understanding.
Patiently, then, persevere: for the Promise of God is true: and ask forgiveness for thy fault, and celebrate the Praises of thy Lord in the evening and in the morning.
Those who dispute about the signs of God without any authority bestowed on them,- there is nothing in their breasts but (the quest of) greatness, which they shall never attain to: seek refuge, then, in God: It is He Who hears and sees (all things).
Assuredly the creation of the heavens and the earth is a greater (matter) than the creation of men: Yet most men understand not.
Not equal are the blind and those who (clearly) see: Nor are (equal) those who believe and work deeds of righteousness, and those who do evil. Little do ye learn by admonition!
The Hour will certainly come: Therein is no doubt: Yet most men believe not.
And your Lord says: "Call on Me; I will answer your (Prayer): but those who are too arrogant to serve Me will surely find themselves in Hell - in humiliation!"
It is God Who has made the Night for you, that ye may rest therein, and the days as that which helps (you) to see. Verily God is full of Grace and Bounty to men: yet most men give no thanks.
Such is God, your Lord, the Creator of all things, there is no god but He: Then how ye are deluded away from the Truth!
Thus are deluded those who are wont to reject the Signs of God.
It is God Who has made for you the earth as a resting place, and the sky as a canopy, and has given you shape- and made your shapes beautiful,- and has provided for you Sustenance, of things pure and good;- such is God your Lord. So Glory to God, the Lord of the Worlds!
He is the Living (One): There is no god but He: Call upon Him, giving Him sincere devotion. Praise be to God, Lord of the Worlds!
Say: "I have been forbidden to invoke those whom ye invoke besides God,- seeing that the Clear Sings have come to me from my Lord; and I have been commanded to bow (in Islam) to the Lord of the Worlds."
It is He Who has created you from dust then from a sperm-drop, then from a leech-like clot; then does he get you out (into the light) as a child: then lets you (grow and) reach your age of full strength; then lets you become old,- though of you there are some who die before;- and lets you reach a Term appointed; in order that ye may learn wisdom.
It is He Who gives Life and Death; and when He decides upon an affair, He says to it, "Be", and it is.
Seest thou not those that dispute concerning the Sings of God? How are they turned away (from Reality)?-
Those who reject the Book and the (revelations) with which We sent our apostles: but soon shall they know,-
When the yokes (shall be) round their necks, and the chains; they shall be dragged along-
In the boiling fetid fluid: then in the Fire shall they be burned;
Then shall it be said to them: "Where are the (deities) to which ye gave part- worship-
"In derogation of God?" They will reply: "They have left us in the lurch: Nay, we invoked not, of old, anything (that had real existence)." Thus does God leave the Unbelievers to stray.
"That was because ye were wont to rejoice on the earth in things other than the Truth, and that ye were wont to be insolent.
"Enter ye the gates of Hell, to dwell therein: and evil is (this) abode of the arrogant!"
So persevere in patience; for the Promise of God is true: and whether We show thee (in this life) some part of what We promise them,- or We take thy soul (to Our Mercy) (before that),-(in any case) it is to Us that they shall (all) return.
We did aforetime send apostles before thee: of them there are some whose story We have related to thee, and some whose story We have not related to thee. It was not (possible) for any apostle to bring a sign except by the leave of God: but when the Command of God issued, the matter was decided in truth and justice, and there perished, there and then those who stood on Falsehoods.
It is God Who made cattle for you, that ye may use some for riding and some for food;
And there are (other) advantages in them for you (besides); that ye may through them attain to any need (there may be) in your hearts; and on them and on ships ye are carried.
And He shows you (always) His Signs: then which of the Signs of God will ye deny?
Do they not travel through the earth and see what was the End of those before them? They were more numerous than these and superior in strength and in the traces (they have left) in the land: Yet all that they accomplished was of no profit to them.
For when their apostles came to them with Clear Signs, they exulted in such knowledge (and skill) as they had; but that very (Wrath) at which they were wont to scoff hemmed them in.
But when they saw Our Punishment, they said: "We believe in God,- the one God - and we reject the partners we used to join with Him."
But their professing the Faith when they (actually) saw Our Punishment was not going to profit them. (Such has been) God's Way of dealing with His Servants (from the most ancient times). And even thus did the Rejecters of God perish (utterly)!
Ha Mim:
A Revelation from (God), Most Gracious, Most Merciful;-
A Book, whereof the verses are explained in detail;- a Qur'an in Arabic, for people who understand;-
Giving good news and admonition: yet most of them turn away, and so they hear not.
They say: "Our hearts are under veils, (concealed) from that to which thou dost invite us, and in our ears in a deafness, and between us and thee is a screen: so do thou (what thou wilt); for us, we shall do (what we will!)"
Say thou: "I am but a man like you: It is revealed to me by Inspiration, that your God is one God: so stand true to Him, and ask for His Forgiveness." And woe to those who join gods with God,-
Those who practise not regular Charity, and who even deny the Hereafter.
For those who believe and work deeds of righteousness is a reward that will never fail.
Say: Is it that ye deny Him Who created the earth in two Days? And do ye join equals with Him? He is the Lord of (all) the Worlds.
He set on the (earth), mountains standing firm, high above it, and bestowed blessings on the earth, and measure therein all things to give them nourishment in due proportion, in four Days, in accordance with (the needs of) those who seek (Sustenance).
Moreover He comprehended in His design the sky, and it had been (as) smoke: He said to it and to the earth: "Come ye together, willingly or unwillingly." They said: "We do come (together), in willing obedience."
So He completed them as seven firmaments in two Days, and He assigned to each heaven its duty and command. And We adorned the lower heaven with lights, and (provided it) with guard. Such is the Decree of (Him) the Exalted in Might, Full of Knowledge.
But if they turn away, say thou: "I have warned you of a stunning Punishment (as of thunder and lightning) like that which (overtook) the 'Ad and the Thamud!"
Behold, the apostles came to them, from before them and behind them, (preaching): "Serve none but God." They said, "If our Lord had so pleased, He would certainly have sent down angels (to preach). Now we reject your mission (altogether)."
Now the 'Ad behaved arrogantly through the land, against (all) truth and reason, and said: "Who is superior to us in strength?" What! did they not see that God, Who created them, was superior to them in strength? But they continued to reject Our Signs!
So We sent against them a furious Wind through days of disaster, that We might give them a taste of a Penalty of humiliation in this life; but the Penalty of a Hereafter will be more humiliating still: and they will find no help.
As to the Thamud, We gave them Guidance, but they preferred blindness (of heart) to Guidance: so the stunning Punishment of humiliation seized them, because of what they had earned.
But We delivered those who believed and practised righteousness.
On the Day that the enemies of God will be gathered together to the Fire, they will be marched in ranks.
At length, when they reach the (Fire), their hearing, their sight, and their skins will bear witness against them, as to (all) their deeds.
They will say to their skins: "Why bear ye witness against us?" They will say: "God hath given us speech,- (He) Who giveth speech to everything: He created you for the first time, and unto Him were ye to return.
"Ye did not seek to hide yourselves, lest your hearing, your sight, and your skins should bear witness against you! But ye did think that God knew not many of the things that ye used to do!
"But this thought of yours which ye did entertain concerning your Lord, hath brought you to destruction, and (now) have ye become of those utterly lost!"
If, then, they have patience, the Fire will be a home for them! and if they beg to be received into favour, into favour will they not (then) be received.
And We have destined for them intimate companions (of like nature), who made alluring to them what was before them and behind them; and the sentence among the previous generations of Jinns and men, who have passed away, is proved against them; for they are utterly lost.
The Unbelievers say: "Listen not to this Qur'an, but talk at random in the midst of its (reading), that ye may gain the upper hand!"
But We will certainly give the Unbelievers a taste of a severe Penalty, and We will requite them for the worst of their deeds.
Such is the requital of the enemies of God,- the Fire: therein will be for them the Eternal Home: a (fit) requital, for that they were wont to reject Our Sings.
And the Unbelievers will say: "Our Lord! Show us those, among Jinns and men, who misled us: We shall crush them beneath our feet, so that they become the vilest (before all)."
In the case of those who say, "Our Lord is God", and, further, stand straight and steadfast, the angels descend on them (from time to time): "Fear ye not!" (they suggest), "Nor grieve! but receive the Glad Tidings of the Garden (of Bliss), the which ye were promised!
"We are your protectors in this life and in the Hereafter: therein shall ye have all that your souls shall desire; therein shall ye have all that ye ask for!-
"A hospitable gift from one Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful!"
Who is better in speech than one who calls (men) to God, works righteousness, and says, "I am of those who bow in Islam"?
Nor can goodness and Evil be equal. Repel (Evil) with what is better: Then will he between whom and thee was hatred become as it were thy friend and intimate!
And no one will be granted such goodness except those who exercise patience and self-restraint,- none but persons of the greatest good fortune.
And if (at any time) an incitement to discord is made to thee by the Evil One, seek refuge in God. He is the One Who hears and knows all things.
Among His Sings are the Night and the Day, and the Sun and the Moon. Adore not the sun and the moon, but adore God, Who created them, if it is Him ye wish to serve.
But is the (Unbelievers) are arrogant, (no matter): for in the presence of thy Lord are those who celebrate His praises by night and by day. And they never flag (nor feel themselves above it).
And among His Signs in this: thou seest the earth barren and desolate; but when We send down rain to it, it is stirred to life and yields increase. Truly, He Who gives life to the (dead) earth can surely give life to (men) who are dead. For He has power over all things.
Those who pervert the Truth in Our Signs are not hidden from Us. Which is better?- he that is cast into the Fire, or he that comes safe through, on the Day of Judgment? Do what ye will: verily He seeth (clearly) all that ye do.
Those who reject the Message when it comes to them (are not hidden from Us). And indeed it is a Book of exalted power.
No falsehood can approach it from before or behind it: It is sent down by One Full of Wisdom, Worthy of all Praise.
Nothing is said to thee that was not said to the apostles before thee: that thy lord has at his Command (all) forgiveness as well as a most Grievous Penalty.
Had We sent this as a Qur'an (in the language) other than Arabic, they would have said: "Why are not its verses explained in detail? What! (a Book) not in Arabic and (a Messenger an Arab?" Say: "It is a Guide and a Healing to those who believe; and for those who believe not, there is a deafness in their ears, and it is blindness in their (eyes): They are (as it were) being called from a place far distant!"
We certainly gave Moses the Book aforetime: but disputes arose therein. Had it not been for a Word that went forth before from thy Lord, (their differences) would have been settled between them: but they remained in suspicious disquieting doubt thereon.
Whoever works righteousness benefits his own soul; whoever works evil, it is against his own soul: nor is thy Lord ever unjust (in the least) to His Servants.
To Him is referred the Knowledge of the Hour (of Judgment: He knows all): No date-fruit comes out of its sheath, nor does a female conceive (within her womb) nor bring forth the Day that (God) will propound to them the (question), "Where are the partners (ye attributed to Me?" They will say, "We do assure thee not one of us can bear witness!"
The (deities) they used to invoke aforetime will leave them in the lurch, and they will perceive that they have no way of escape.
Man does not weary of asking for good (things), but if ill touches him, he gives up all hope (and) is lost in despair.
When we give him a taste of some Mercy from Ourselves, after some adversity has touched him, he is sure to say, "This is due to my (merit): I think not that the Hour (of Judgment) will (ever) be established; but if I am brought back to my Lord, I have (much) good (stored) in His sight!" But We will show the Unbelievers the truth of all that they did, and We shall give them the taste of a severe Penalty.
When We bestow favours on man, he turns away, and gets himself remote on his side (instead of coming to Us); and when evil seizes him, (he comes) full of prolonged prayer!
Say: "See ye if the (Revelation) is (really) from God, and yet do ye reject it? Who is more astray than one who is in a schism far (from any purpose)?"
Soon will We show them our Signs in the (furthest) regions (of the earth), and in their own souls, until it becomes manifest to them that this is the Truth. Is it not enough that thy Lord doth witness all things?
Ah indeed! Are they in doubt concerning the Meeting with their Lord? Ah indeed! It is He that doth encompass all things!
Ha-Mim
'Ain. Sin. Qaf.
Thus doth (He) send inspiration to thee as (He did) to those before thee,- God, Exalted in Power, Full of Wisdom.
To Him belongs all that is in the heavens and on earth: and He is Most High, Most Great.
The heavens are almost rent asunder from above them (by Him Glory): and the angels celebrate the Praises of their Lord, and pray for forgiveness for (all) beings on earth: Behold! Verily God is He, the Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
And those who take as protectors others besides Him,- God doth watch over them; and thou art not the disposer of their affairs.
Thus have We sent by inspiration to thee an Arabic Qur'an: that thou mayest warn the Mother of Cities and all around her,- and warn (them) of the Day of Assembly, of which there is no doubt: (when) some will be in the Garden, and some in the Blazing Fire.
If God had so willed, He could have made them a single people; but He admits whom He will to His Mercy; and the Wrong-doers will have no protector nor helper.
What! Have they taken (for worship) protectors besides Him? But it is God,- He is the Protector, and it is He Who gives life to the dead: It is He Who has power over all things,
Whatever it be wherein ye differ, the decision thereof is with God: such is God my Lord: In Him I trust, and to Him I turn.
(He is) the Creator of the heavens and the earth: He has made for you pairs from among yourselves, and pairs among cattle: by this means does He multiply you: there is nothing whatever like unto Him, and He is the One that hears and sees (all things).
To Him belong the keys of the heavens and the earth: He enlarges and restricts. The Sustenance to whom He will: for He knows full well all things.
The same religion has He established for you as that which He enjoined on Noah - the which We have sent by inspiration to thee - and that which We enjoined on Abraham, Moses, and Jesus: Namely, that ye should remain steadfast in religion, and make no divisions therein: to those who worship other things than God, hard is the (way) to which thou callest them. God chooses to Himself those whom He pleases, and guides to Himself those who turn (to Him).
And they became divided only after Knowledge reached them,- through selfish envy as between themselves. Had it not been for a Word that went forth before from thy Lord, (tending) to a Term appointed, the matter would have been settled between them: But truly those who have inherited the Book after them are in suspicious (disquieting) doubt concerning it.
Now then, for that (reason), call (them to the Faith), and stand steadfast as thou art commanded, nor follow thou their vain desires; but say: "I believe in the Book which God has sent down; and I am commanded to judge justly between you. God is our Lord and your Lord: for us (is the responsibility for) our deeds, and for you for your deeds. There is no contention between us and you. God will bring us together, and to Him is (our) Final Goal.
But those who dispute concerning God after He has been accepted,- futile is their dispute in the Sight of their Lord: on them will be a Penalty terrible.
It is God Who has sent down the Book in Truth, and the Balance (by which to weigh conduct). And what will make thee realise that perhaps the Hour is close at hand?
Only those wish to hasten it who believe not in it: those who believe hold it in awe, and know that it is the Truth. Behold, verily those that dispute concerning the Hour are far astray.
Gracious is God to His servants: He gives Sustenance to whom He pleases: and He has power and can carry out His Will.
To any that desires the tilth of the Hereafter, We give increase in his tilth, and to any that desires the tilth of this world, We grant somewhat thereof, but he has no share or lot in the Hereafter.
What! have they partners (in godhead), who have established for them some religion without the permission of God? Had it not been for the Decree of Judgment, the matter would have been decided between them (at once). But verily the Wrong- doers will have a grievous Penalty.
Thou wilt see the Wrong-doers in fear on account of what they have earned, and (the burden of) that must (necessarily) fall on them. But those who believe and work righteous deeds will be in the luxuriant meads of the Gardens: they shall have, before their Lord, all that they wish for. That will indeed be the magnificent Bounty (of God).
That is (the Bounty) whereof God gives Glad Tidings to His Servants who believe and do righteous deeds. Say: "No reward do I ask of you for this except the love of those near of kin." And if any one earns any good, We shall give him an increase of good in respect thereof: for God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Ready to appreciate (service).
What! Do they say, "He has forged a falsehood against God"? But if God willed, He could seal up thy heart. And God blots out Vanity, and proves the Truth by His Words. For He knows well the secrets of all hearts.
He is the One that accepts repentance from His Servants and forgives sins: and He knows all that ye do.
And He listens to those who believe and do deeds of righteousness, and gives them increase of His Bounty: but for the Unbelievers their is a terrible Penalty.
If God were to enlarge the provision for His Servants, they would indeed transgress beyond all bounds through the earth; but he sends (it) down in due measure as He pleases. For He is with His Servants Well-acquainted, Watchful.
He is the One that sends down rain (even) after (men) have given up all hope, and scatters His Mercy (far and wide). And He is the Protector, Worthy of all Praise.
And among His Signs is the creation of the heavens and the earth, and the living creatures that He has scattered through them: and He has power to gather them together when He wills.
Whatever misfortune happens to you, is because on the things your hands have wrought, and for many (of them) He grants forgiveness.
Nor can ye frustrate (aught), (fleeing) through the earth; nor have ye, besides God, any one to protect or to help.
And among His Signs are the ships, smooth-running through the ocean, (tall) as mountains.
If it be His Will He can still the Wind: then would they become motionless on the back of the (ocean). Verily in this are Signs for everyone who patiently perseveres and is grateful.
Or He can cause them to perish because of the (evil) which (the men) have earned; but much doth He forgive.
But let those know, who dispute about Our Signs, that there is for them no way of escape.
Whatever ye are given (here) is (but) a convenience of this life: but that which is with God is better and more lasting: (it is) for those who believe and put their trust in their Lord:
Those who avoid the greater crimes and shameful deeds, and, when they are angry even then forgive;
Those who hearken to their Lord, and establish regular Prayer; who (conduct) their affairs by mutual Consultation; who spend out of what We bestow on them for Sustenance;
And those who, when an oppressive wrong is inflicted on them, (are not cowed but) help and defend themselves.
The recompense for an injury is an injury equal thereto (in degree): but if a person forgives and makes reconciliation, his reward is due from God: for (God) loveth not those who do wrong.
But indeed if any do help and defend themselves after a wrong (done) to them, against such there is no cause of blame.
The blame is only against those who oppress men and wrong-doing and insolently transgress beyond bounds through the land, defying right and justice: for such there will be a penalty grievous.
But indeed if any show patience and forgive, that would truly be an exercise of courageous will and resolution in the conduct of affairs.
For any whom God leaves astray, there is no protector thereafter. And thou wilt see the Wrong-doers, when in sight of the Penalty, Say: "Is there any way (to effect) a return?"
And thou wilt see them brought forward to the (Penalty), in a humble frame of mind because of (their) disgrace, (and) looking with a stealthy glance. And the Believers will say: "Those are indeed in loss, who have given to perdition their own selves and those belonging to them on the Day of Judgment. Behold! Truly the Wrong-doers are in a lasting Penalty!"
And no protectors have they to help them, other than God. And for any whom God leaves to stray, there is no way (to the Goal).
Hearken ye to your Lord, before there come a Day which there will be no putting back, because of (the Ordainment of) God! that Day there will be for you no place of refuge nor will there be for you any room for denial (of your sins)!
If then they run away, We have not sent thee as a guard over them. Thy duty is but to convey (the Message). And truly, when We give man a taste of a Mercy from Ourselves, he doth exult thereat, but when some ill happens to him, on account of the deeds which his hands have sent forth, truly then is man ungrateful!
To God belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth. He creates what He wills (and plans). He bestows (children) male or female according to His Will (and Plan),
Or He bestows both males and females, and He leaves barren whom He will: for He is full of Knowledge and Power.
It is not fitting for a man that God should speak to him except by inspiration, or from behind a veil, or by the sending of a messenger to reveal, with God's permission, what God wills: for He is Most High, Most Wise.
And thus have We, by Our Command, sent inspiration to thee: thou knewest not (before) what was Revelation, and what was Faith; but We have made the (Qur'an) a Light, wherewith We guide such of Our servants as We will; and verily thou dost guide (men) to the Straight Way,-
The Way of God, to Whom belongs whatever is in the heavens and whatever is on earth. Behold (how) all affairs tend towards God!
Ha-Mim
By the Book that makes things clear,-
We have made it a Qur'an in Arabic, that ye may be able to understand (and learn wisdom).
And verily, it is in the Mother of the Book, in Our Presence, high (in dignity), full of wisdom.
Shall We then take away the Message from you and repel (you), for that ye are a people transgressing beyond bounds?
But how many were the prophets We sent amongst the peoples of old?
And never came there a prophet to them but they mocked him.
So We destroyed (them)- stronger in power than these;- and (thus) has passed on the Parable of the peoples of old.
If thou wert to question them, 'Who created the heavens and the earth?' They would be sure to reply, 'they were created by (Him), the Exalted in Power, Full of Knowledge';-
(Yea, the same that) has made for you the earth (like a carpet) spread out, and has made for you roads (and channels) therein, in order that ye may find guidance (on the way);
That sends down (from time to time) rain from the sky in due measure;- and We raise to life therewith a land that is dead; even so will ye be raised (from the dead);-
That has created pairs in all things, and has made for you ships and cattle on which ye ride,
In order that ye may sit firm and square on their backs, and when so seated, ye may celebrate the (kind) favour of your Lord, and say, "Glory to Him Who has subjected these to our (use), for we could never have accomplished this (by ourselves),
"And to our Lord, surely, must we turn back!"
Yet they attribute to some of His servants a share with Him (in his godhead)! truly is man a blasphemous ingrate avowed!
What! has He taken daughters out of what He himself creates, and granted to you sons for choice?
When news is brought to one of them of (the birth of) what he sets up as a likeness to (God) Most Gracious, his face darkens, and he is filled with inward grief!
Is then one brought up among trinkets, and unable to give a clear account in a dispute (to be associated with God)?
And they make into females angels who themselves serve God. Did they witness their creation? Their evidence will be recorded, and they will be called to account!
("Ah!") they say, "If it had been the will of (God) Most Gracious, we should not have worshipped such (deities)!" Of that they have no knowledge! they do nothing but lie!
What! have We given them a Book before this, to which they are holding fast?
Nay! they say: "We found our fathers following a certain religion, and we do guide ourselves by their footsteps."
Just in the same way, whenever We sent a Warner before thee to any people, the wealthy ones among them said: "We found our fathers following a certain religion, and we will certainly follow in their footsteps."
He said: "What! Even if I brought you better guidance than that which ye found your fathers following?" They said: "For us, we deny that ye (prophets) are sent (on a mission at all)."
So We exacted retribution from them: now see what was the end of those who rejected (Truth)!
Behold! Abraham said to his father and his people: "I do indeed clear myself of what ye worship:
"(I worship) only Him Who made me, and He will certainly guide me."
And he left it as a Word to endure among those who came after him, that they may turn back (to God).
Yea, I have given the good things of this life to these (men) and their fathers, until the Truth has come to them, and an apostle making things clear.
But when the Truth came to them, they said: "This is sorcery, and we do reject it."
Also, they say: "Why is not this Qur'an sent down to some leading man in either of the two (chief) cities?"
Is it they who would portion out the Mercy of thy Lord? It is We Who portion out between them their livelihood in the life of this world: and We raise some of them above others in ranks, so that some may command work from others. But the Mercy of thy Lord is better than the (wealth) which they amass.
And were it not that (all) men might become of one (evil) way of life, We would provide, for everyone that blasphemes against (God) Most Gracious, silver roofs for their houses and (silver) stair-ways on which to go up,
And (silver) doors to their houses, and thrones (of silver) on which they could recline,
And also adornments of gold. But all this were nothing but conveniences of the present life: The Hereafter, in the sight of thy Lord is for the Righteous.
If anyone withdraws himself from remembrance of (God) Most Gracious, We appoint for him an evil one, to be an intimate companion to him.
Such (evil ones) really hinder them from the Path, but they think that they are being guided aright!
At length, when (such a one) comes to Us, he says (to his evil companion): "Would that between me and thee were the distance of East and West!" Ah! evil is the companion (indeed)!
When ye have done wrong, it will avail you nothing, that Day, that ye shall be partners in Punishment!
Canst thou then make the deaf to hear, or give direction to the blind or to such as (wander) in manifest error?
Even if We take thee away, We shall be sure to exact retribution from them,
Or We shall show thee that (accomplished) which We have promised them: for verily We shall prevail over them.
So hold thou fast to the Revelation sent down to thee; verily thou art on a Straight Way.
The (Qur'an) is indeed the message, for thee and for thy people; and soon shall ye (all) be brought to account.
And question thou our apostles whom We sent before thee; did We appoint any deities other than (God) Most Gracious, to be worshipped?
We did send Moses aforetime, with Our Signs, to Pharaoh and his Chiefs: He said, "I am an apostle of the Lord of the Worlds."
But when he came to them with Our Signs, behold they ridiculed them.
We showed them Sign after Sign, each greater than its fellow, and We seized them with Punishment, in order that they might turn (to Us).
And they said, "O thou sorcerer! Invoke thy Lord for us according to His covenant with thee; for we shall truly accept guidance."
But when We removed the Penalty from them, behold, they broke their word.
And Pharaoh proclaimed among his people, saying: "O my people! Does not the dominion of Egypt belong to me, (witness) these streams flowing underneath my (palace)? What! see ye not then?
"Am I not better than this (Moses), who is a contemptible wretch and can scarcely express himself clearly?
"Then why are not gold bracelets bestowed on him, or (why) come (not) with him angels accompanying him in procession?"
Thus did he make fools of his people, and they obeyed him: truly were they a people rebellious (against God).
When at length they provoked Us, We exacted retribution from them, and We drowned them all.
And We made them (a people) of the Past and an Example to later ages.
When (Jesus) the son of Mary is held up as an example, behold, thy people raise a clamour thereat (in ridicule)!
And they say, "Are our gods best, or he?" This they set forth to thee, only by way of disputation: yea, they are a contentious people.
He was no more than a servant: We granted Our favour to him, and We made him an example to the Children of Israel.
And if it were Our Will, We could make angels from amongst you, succeeding each other on the earth.
And (Jesus) shall be a Sign (for the coming of) the Hour (of Judgment): therefore have no doubt about the (Hour), but follow ye Me: this is a Straight Way.
Let not the Evil One hinder you: for he is to you an enemy avowed.
When Jesus came with Clear Signs, he said: "Now have I come to you with Wisdom, and in order to make clear to you some of the (points) on which ye dispute: therefore fear God and obey me.
"For God, He is my Lord and your Lord: so worship ye Him: this is a Straight Way."
But sects from among themselves fell into disagreement: then woe to the wrong-doers, from the Penalty of a Grievous Day!
Do they only wait for the Hour - that it should come on them all of a sudden, while they perceive not?
Friends on that day will be foes, one to another,- except the Righteous.
My devotees! no fear shall be on you that Day, nor shall ye grieve,-
(Being) those who have believed in Our Signs and bowed (their wills to Ours) in Islam.
Enter ye the Garden, ye and your wives, in (beauty and) rejoicing.
To them will be passed round, dishes and goblets of gold: there will be there all that the souls could desire, all that their ayes could delight in: and ye shall abide therein (for eye).
Such will be the Garden of which ye are made heirs for your (good) deeds (in life).
Ye shall have therein abundance of fruit, from which ye shall have satisfaction.
The sinners will be in the Punishment of Hell, to dwell therein (for aye):
Nowise will the (Punishment) be lightened for them, and in despair will they be there overwhelmed.
Nowise shall We be unjust to them: but it is they who have been unjust themselves.
They will cry: "O Malik! would that thy Lord put an end to us!" He will say, "Nay, but ye shall abide!"
Verily We have brought the Truth to you: but most of you have a hatred for Truth.
What! have they settled some plan (among themselves)? But it is We Who settle things.
Or do they think that We hear not their secrets and their private counsels? Indeed (We do), and Our messengers are by them, to record.
Say: "If (God) Most Gracious had a son, I would be the first to worship."
Glory to the Lord of the heavens and the earth, the Lord of the Throne (of Authority)! (He is free) from the things they attribute (to him)!
So leave them to babble and play (with vanities) until they meet that Day of theirs, which they have been promised.
It is He Who is God in heaven and God on earth; and He is full of Wisdom and Knowledge.
And blessed is He to Whom belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth, and all between them: with Him is the Knowledge of the Hour (of Judgment): and to Him shall ye be brought back.
And those whom they invoke besides God have no power of intercession;- only he who bears witness to the Truth, and they know (him).
If thou ask them, who created them, they will certainly say, God: How then are they deluded away (from the Truth)?
(God has knowledge) of the (Prophet's) cry, "O my Lord! Truly these are people who will not believe!"
But turn away from them, and say "Peace!" But soon shall they know!
Ha-Mim.
By the Book that makes things clear;-
We sent it down during a Blessed Night: for We (ever) wish to warn (against Evil).
In the (Night) is made distinct every affair of wisdom,
By command, from Our Presence. For We (ever) send (revelations),
As Mercy from thy Lord: for He hears and knows (all things);
The Lord of the heavens and the earth and all between them, if ye (but) have an assured faith.
There is no god but He: It is He Who gives life and gives death,- The Lord and Cherisher to you and your earliest ancestors.
Yet they play about in doubt.
Then watch thou for the Day that the sky will bring forth a kind of smoke (or mist) plainly visible,
Enveloping the people: this will be a Penalty Grievous.
(They will say:) "Our Lord! remove the Penalty from us, for we do really believe!"
How shall the message be (effectual) for them, seeing that an Apostle explaining things clearly has (already) come to them,-
Yet they turn away from him and say: "Tutored (by others), a man possessed!"
We shall indeed remove the Penalty for a while, (but) truly ye will revert (to your ways).
One day We shall seize you with a mighty onslaught: We will indeed (then) exact Retribution!
We did, before them, try the people of Pharaoh: there came to them an apostle most honourable,
Saying: "Restore to me the Servants of God: I am to you an apostle worthy of all trust;
"And be not arrogant as against God: for I come to you with authority manifest.
"For me, I have sought safety with my Lord and your Lord, against your injuring me.
"If ye believe me not, at least keep yourselves away from me."
(But they were aggressive:) then he cried to his Lord: "These are indeed a people given to sin."
(The reply came:) "March forth with My Servants by night: for ye are sure to be pursued.
"And leave the sea as a furrow (divided): for they are a host (destined) to be drowned."
How many were the gardens and springs they left behind,
And corn-fields and noble buildings,
And wealth (and conveniences of life), wherein they had taken such delight!
Thus (was their end)! And We made other people inherit (those things)!
And neither heaven nor earth shed a tear over them: nor were they given a respite (again).
We did deliver aforetime the Children of Israel from humiliating Punishment,
Inflicted by Pharaoh, for he was arrogant (even) among inordinate transgressors.
And We chose them aforetime above the nations, knowingly,
And granted them Signs in which there was a manifest trial
As to these (Quraish), they say forsooth:
"There is nothing beyond our first death, and we shall not be raised again.
"Then bring (back) our forefathers, if what ye say is true!"
What! Are they better than the people of Tubba and those who were before them? We destroyed them because they were guilty of sin.
We created not the heavens, the earth, and all between them, merely in (idle) sport:
We created them not except for just ends: but most of them do not understand.
Verily the Day of sorting out is the time appointed for all of them,-
The Day when no protector can avail his client in aught, and no help can they receive,
Except such as receive God's Mercy: for He is Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
Verily the tree of Zaqqum
Will be the food of the Sinful,-
Like molten brass; it will boil in their insides.
Like the boiling of scalding water.
(A voice will cry: "Seize ye him and drag him into the midst of the Blazing Fire!
"Then pour over his head the Penalty of Boiling Water,
"Taste thou (this)! Truly wast thou mighty, full of honour!
"Truly this is what ye used to doubt!"
As to the Righteous (they will be) in a position of Security,
Among Gardens and Springs;
Dressed in fine silk and in rich brocade, they will face each other;
So; and We shall join them to Companions with beautiful, big, and lustrous eyes.
There can they call for every kind of fruit in peace and security;
Nor will they there taste Death, except the first death; and He will preserve them from the Penalty of the Blazing Fire,-
As a Bounty from thy Lord! that will be the supreme achievement!
Verily, We have made this (Qur'an) easy, in thy tongue, in order that they may give heed.
So wait thou and watch; for they (too) are waiting.
Ha-Mim.
The revelation of the Book is from God the Exalted in Power, Full of Wisdom.
Verily in the heavens and the earth, are Signs for those who believe.
And in the creation of yourselves and the fact that animals are scattered (through the earth), are Signs for those of assured Faith.
And in the alternation of Night and Day, and the fact that God sends down Sustenance from the sky, and revives therewith the earth after its death, and in the change of the winds,- are Signs for those that are wise.
Such are the Signs of God, which We rehearse to thee in Truth; then in what exposition will they believe after (rejecting) God and His Signs?
Woe to each sinful dealer in Falsehoods:
He hears the Signs of God rehearsed to him, yet is obstinate and lofty, as if he had not heard them: then announce to him a Penalty Grievous!
And when he learns something of Our Signs, he takes them in jest: for such there will be a humiliating Penalty.
In front of them is Hell: and of no profit to them is anything they may have earned, nor any protectors they may have taken to themselves besides God: for them is a tremendous Penalty.
This is (true) Guidance and for those who reject the Signs of their Lord, is a grievous Penalty of abomination.
It is God Who has subjected the sea to you, that ships may sail through it by His command, that ye may seek of his Bounty, and that ye may be grateful.
And He has subjected to you, as from Him, all that is in the heavens and on earth: Behold, in that are Signs indeed for those who reflect.
Tell those who believe, to forgive those who do not look forward to the Days of God: It is for Him to recompense (for good or ill) each People according to what they have earned.
If any one does a righteous deed, it ensures to the benefit of his own soul; if he does evil, it works against (his own soul). In the end will ye (all) be brought back to your Lord.
We did aforetime grant to the Children of Israel the Book the Power of Command, and Prophethood; We gave them, for Sustenance, things good and pure; and We favoured them above the nations.
And We granted them Clear Signs in affairs (of Religion): it was only after knowledge had been granted to them that they fell into schisms, through insolent envy among themselves. Verily thy Lord will judge between them on the Day of Judgment as to those matters in which they set up differences.
Then We put thee on the (right) Way of Religion: so follow thou that (Way), and follow not the desires of those who know not.
They will be of no use to thee in the sight of God: it is only Wrong-doers (that stand as) protectors, one to another: but God is the Protector of the Righteous.
These are clear evidences to men and a Guidance and Mercy to those of assured Faith.
What! Do those who seek after evil ways think that We shall hold them equal with those who believe and do righteous deeds,- that equal will be their life and their death? Ill is the judgment that they make.
God created the heavens and the earth for just ends, and in order that each soul may find the recompense of what it has earned, and none of them be wronged.
Then seest thou such a one as takes as his god his own vain desire? God has, knowing (him as such), left him astray, and sealed his hearing and his heart (and understanding), and put a cover on his sight. Who, then, will guide him after God (has withdrawn Guidance)? Will ye not then receive admonition?
And they say: "What is there but our life in this world? We shall die and we live, and nothing but time can destroy us." But of that they have no knowledge: they merely conjecture:
And when Our Clear Signs are rehearsed to them their argument is nothing but this: They say, "Bring (back) our forefathers, if what ye say is true!"
Say: "It is God Who gives you life, then gives you death; then He will gather you together for the Day of Judgment about which there is no doubt": But most men do not understand.
To God belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth, and the Day that the Hour of Judgment is established,- that Day will the dealers in Falsehood perish!
And thou wilt see every sect bowing the knee: Every sect will be called to its Record: "This Day shall ye be recompensed for all that ye did!
"This Our Record speaks about you with truth: For We were wont to put on Record all that ye did."
Then, as to those who believed and did righteous deeds, their Lord will admit them to His Mercy that will be the achievement for all to see.
But as to those who rejected God, (to them will be said): "Were not Our Signs rehearsed to you? But ye were arrogant, and were a people given to sin!
"And when it was said that the promise of God was true, and that the Hour- there was no doubt about its (coming), ye used to say, 'We know not what is the hour: we only think it is an idea, and we have no firm assurance.'"
Then will appear to them the evil (fruits) of what they did, and they will be completely encircled by that which they used to mock at!
It will also be said: "This Day We will forget you as ye forgot the meeting of this Day of yours! and your abode is the Fire, and no helpers have ye!
"This, because ye used to take the Signs of God in jest, and the life of the world deceived you:" (From) that Day, therefore, they shall not be taken out thence, nor shall they be received into Grace.
Then Praise be to God, Lord of the heavens and Lord of the earth,- Lord and Cherisher of all the Worlds!
To Him be glory throughout the heavens and the earth: and He is Exalted in Power, Full of Wisdom!
Ha-Mim.
The Revelation of the Book is from God the Exalted in Power, Full of Wisdom.
We created not the heavens and the earth and all between them but for just ends, and for a Term Appointed: But those who reject Faith turn away from that whereof they are warned.
Say: "Do ye see what it is ye invoke besides God? Show me what it is they have created on earth, or have they a share in the heavens bring me a book (revealed) before this, or any remnant of knowledge (ye may have), if ye are telling the truth!
And who is more astray than one who invokes besides God, such as will not answer him to the Day of Judgment, and who (in fact) are unconscious of their call (to them)?
And when mankind are gathered together (at the Resurrection), they will be hostile to them and reject their worship (altogether)!
When Our Clear Signs are rehearsed to them, the Unbelievers say, of the Truth when it comes to them: "This is evident sorcery!"
Or do they say, "He has forged it"? Say: "Had I forged it, then can ye obtain no single (blessing) for me from God. He knows best of that whereof ye talk (so glibly)! Enough is He for a witness between me and you! And he is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful."
Say: "I am no bringer of new-fangled doctrine among the apostles, nor do I know what will be done with me or with you. I follow but that which is revealed to me by inspiration; I am but a Warner open and clear."
Say: "See ye? If (this teaching) be from God, and ye reject it, and a witness from among the Children of Israel testifies to its similarity (with earlier scripture), and has believed while ye are arrogant, (how unjust ye are!) truly, God guides not a people unjust."
The Unbelievers say of those who believe: "If (this Message) were a good thing, (such men) would not have gone to it first, before us!" And seeing that they guide not themselves thereby, they will say, "this is an (old,) falsehood!"
And before this, was the Book of Moses as a guide and a mercy: And this Book confirms (it) in the Arabic tongue; to admonish the unjust, and as Glad Tidings to those who do right.
Verily those who say, "Our Lord is God," and remain firm (on that Path),- on them shall be no fear, nor shall they grieve.
Such shall be Companions of the Gardens, dwelling therein (for aye): a recompense for their (good) deeds.
We have enjoined on man kindness to his parents: In pain did his mother bear him, and in pain did she give him birth. The carrying of the (child) to his weaning is (a period of) thirty months. At length, when he reaches the age of full strength and attains forty years, he says, "O my Lord! Grant me that I may be grateful for Thy favour which Thou has bestowed upon me, and upon both my parents, and that I may work righteousness such as Thou mayest approve; and be gracious to me in my issue. Truly have I turned to Thee and truly do I bow (to Thee) in Islam."
Such are they from whom We shall accept the best of their deeds and pass by their ill deeds: (They shall be) among the Companions of the Garden: a promise! of truth, which was made to them (in this life).
But (there is one) who says to his parents, "Fie on you! Do ye hold out the promise to me that I shall be raised up, even though generations have passed before me (without rising again)?" And they two seek God's aid, (and rebuke the son): "Woe to thee! Have faith! for the promise of God is true." But he says, "This is nothing but tales of the ancients!"
Such are they against whom is proved the sentence among the previous generations of Jinns and men, that have passed away; for they will be (utterly) lost.
And to all are (assigned) degrees according to the deeds which they (have done), and in order that (God) may recompense their deeds, and no injustice be done to them.
And on the Day that the Unbelievers will be placed before the Fire, (It will be said to them): "Ye received your good things in the life of the world, and ye took your pleasure out of them: but today shall ye be recompensed with a Penalty of humiliation: for that ye were arrogant on earth without just cause, and that ye (ever) transgressed."
Mention (Hud) one of 'Ad's (own) brethren: Behold, he warned his people about the winding Sand-tracts: but there have been warners before him and after him: "Worship ye none other than God: Truly I fear for you the Penalty of a Mighty Day."
They said: "Hast thou come in order to turn us aside from our gods? Then bring upon us the (calamity) with which thou dost threaten us, if thou art telling the truth?"
He said: "The Knowledge (of when it will come) is only with God: I proclaim to you the mission on which I have been sent: But I see that ye are a people in ignorance!"..
Then, when they saw the (Penalty in the shape of) a cloud traversing the sky, coming to meet their valleys, they said, "This cloud will give us rain!" "Nay, it is the (Calamity) ye were asking to be hastened!- A wind wherein is a Grievous Penalty!
"Everything will it destroy by the command of its Lord!" Then by the morning they - nothing was to be seen but (the ruins of) their houses! thus do We recompense those given to sin!
And We had firmly established them in a (prosperity and) power which We have not given to you (ye Quraish!) and We had endowed them with (faculties of) hearing, seeing, heart and intellect: but of no profit to them were their (faculties of) hearing, sight, and heart and intellect, when they went on rejecting the Signs of God; and they were (completely) encircled by that which they used to mock at!
We destroyed aforetime populations round about you; and We have shown the Signs in various ways, that they may turn (to Us).
Why then was no help forthcoming to them from those whom they worshipped as gods, besides God, as a means of access (to God)? Nay, they left them in the lurch: but that was their falsehood and their invention.
Behold, We turned towards thee a company of Jinns (quietly) listening to the Qur'an: when they stood in the presence thereof, they said, "Listen in silence!" When the (reading) was finished, they returned to their people, to warn (them of their sins).
They said, "O our people! We have heard a Book revealed after Moses, confirming what came before it: it guides (men) to the Truth and to a Straight Path.
"O our people, hearken to the one who invites (you) to God, and believe in him: He will forgive you your faults, and deliver you from a Penalty Grievous.
"If any does not hearken to the one who invites (us) to God, he cannot frustrate (God's Plan) on earth, and no protectors can he have besides God: such men (wander) in manifest error."
See they not that God, Who created the heavens and the earth, and never wearied with their creation, is able to give life to the dead? Yea, verily He has power over all things.
And on the Day that the Unbelievers will be placed before the Fire, (they will be asked,) "Is this not the Truth?" they will say, "Yea, by our Lord!" (One will say:) "Then taste ye the Penalty, for that ye were wont to deny (Truth)!"
Therefore patiently persevere, as did (all) apostles of inflexible purpose; and be in no haste about the (Unbelievers). On the Day that they see the (Punishment) promised them, (it will be) as if they had not tarried more than an hour in a single day. (Thine but) to proclaim the Message: but shall any be destroyed except those who transgress?
Those who reject God and hinder (men) from the Path of God,- their deeds will God render astray (from their mark).
But those who believe and work deeds of righteousness, and believe in the (Revelation) sent down to Muhammad - for it is the Truth from their Lord,- He will remove from them their ills and improve their condition.
This because those who reject God follow vanities, while those who believe follow the Truth from their Lord: Thus does God set forth for men their lessons by similitudes.
Therefore, when ye meet the Unbelievers (in fight), smite at their necks; At length, when ye have thoroughly subdued them, bind a bond firmly (on them): thereafter (is the time for) either generosity or ransom: Until the war lays down its burdens. Thus (are ye commanded): but if it had been God's Will, He could certainly have exacted retribution from them (Himself); but (He lets you fight) in order to test you, some with others. But those who are slain in the Way of God,- He will never let their deeds be lost.
Soon will He guide them and improve their condition,
And admit them to the Garden which He has announced for them.
O ye who believe! If ye will aid (the cause of) God, He will aid you, and plant your feet firmly.
But those who reject (God),- for them is destruction, and (God) will render their deeds astray (from their mark).
That is because they hate the Revelation of God; so He has made their deeds fruitless.
Do they not travel through the earth, and see what was the End of those before them (who did evil)? God brought utter destruction on them, and similar (fates await) those who reject God.
That is because God is the Protector of those who believe, but those who reject God have no protector.
Verily God will admit those who believe and do righteous deeds, to Gardens beneath which rivers flow; while those who reject God will enjoy (this world) and eat as cattle eat; and the Fire will be their abode.
And how many cities, with more power than thy city which has driven thee out, have We destroyed (for their sins)? and there was none to aid them.
Is then one who is on a clear (Path) from his Lord, no better than one to whom the evil of his conduct seems pleasing, and such as follow their own lusts?
(Here is) a Parable of the Garden which the righteous are promised: in it are rivers of water incorruptible; rivers of milk of which the taste never changes; rivers of wine, a joy to those who drink; and rivers of honey pure and clear. In it there are for them all kinds of fruits; and Grace from their Lord. (Can those in such Bliss) be compared to such as shall dwell for ever in the Fire, and be given, to drink, boiling water, so that it cuts up their bowels (to pieces)?
And among them are men who listen to thee, but in the end, when they go out from thee, they say to those who have received Knowledge, "What is it he said just then?" Such are men whose hearts God has sealed, and who follow their own lusts.
But to those who receive Guidance, He increases the (light of) Guidance, and bestows on them their Piety and Restraint (from evil).
Do they then only wait for the Hour,- that it should come on them of a sudden? But already have come some tokens thereof, and when it (actually) is on them, how can they benefit then by their admonition?
Know, therefore, that there is no god but God, and ask forgiveness for thy fault, and for the men and women who believe: for God knows how ye move about and how ye dwell in your homes.
Those who believe say, "Why is not a sura sent down (for us)?" But when a sura of basic or categorical meaning is revealed, and fighting is mentioned therein, thou wilt see those in whose hearts is a disease looking at thee with a look of one in swoon at the approach of death. But more fitting for them-
Were it to obey and say what is just, and when a matter is resolved on, it were best for them if they were true to God.
Then, is it to be expected of you, if ye were put in authority, that ye will do mischief in the land, and break your ties of kith and kin?
Such are the men whom God has cursed for He has made them deaf and blinded their sight.
Do they not then earnestly seek to understand the Qur'an, or are their hearts locked up by them?
Those who turn back as apostates after Guidance was clearly shown to them,- the Evil One has instigated them and busied them up with false hopes.
This, because they said to those who hate what God has revealed, "We will obey you in part of (this) matter"; but God knows their (inner) secrets.
But how (will it be) when the angels take their souls at death, and smite their faces and their backs?
This because they followed that which called forth the Wrath of God, and they hated God's good pleasure; so He made their deeds of no effect.
Or do those in whose hearts is a disease, think that God will not bring to light all their rancour?
Had We so wiled, We could have shown them up to thee, and thou shouldst have known them by their marks: but surely thou wilt know them by the tone of their speech! And God knows all that ye do.
And We shall try you until We test those among you who strive their utmost and persevere in patience; and We shall try your reported (mettle).
Those who reject God, hinder (men) from the Path of God, and resist the Apostle, after Guidance has been clearly shown to them, will not injure God in the least, but He will make their deeds of no effect.
O ye who believe! Obey God, and obey the apostle, and make not vain your deeds!
Those who reject God, and hinder (men) from the Path of God, then die rejecting God,- God will not forgive them.
Be not weary and faint-hearted, crying for peace, when ye should be uppermost: for God is with you, and will never put you in loss for your (good) deeds.
The life of this world is but play and amusement: and if ye believe and guard against Evil, He will grant you your recompense, and will not ask you (to give up) your possessions.
If He were to ask you for all of them, and press you, ye would covetously withhold, and He would bring out all your ill-feeling.
Behold, ye are those invited to spend (of your substance) in the Way of God: But among you are some that are niggardly. But any who are niggardly are so at the expense of their own souls. But God is free of all wants, and it is ye that are needy. If ye turn back (from the Path), He will substitute in your stead another people; then they would not be like you!
Verily We have granted thee a manifest Victory:
That God may forgive thee thy faults of the past and those to follow; fulfil His favour to thee; and guide thee on the Straight Way;
And that God may help thee with powerful help.
It is He Who sent down tranquillity into the hearts of the Believers, that they may add faith to their faith;- for to God belong the Forces of the heavens and the earth; and God is Full of Knowledge and Wisdom;-
That He may admit the men and women who believe, to Gardens beneath which rivers flow, to dwell therein for aye, and remove their ills from them;- and that is, in the sight of God, the highest achievement (for man),-
And that He may punish the Hypocrites, men and women, and the Polytheists men and women, who imagine an evil opinion of God. On them is a round of Evil: the Wrath of God is on them: He has cursed them and got Hell ready for them: and evil is it for a destination.
For to God belong the Forces of the heavens and the earth; and God is Exalted in Power, Full of Wisdom.
We have truly sent thee as a witness, as a bringer of Glad Tidings, and as a Warner:
In order that ye (O men) may believe in God and His Apostle, that ye may assist and honour Him, and celebrate His praise morning and evening.
Verily those who plight their fealty to thee do no less than plight their fealty to God: the Hand of God is over their hands: then any one who violates his oath, does so to the harm of his own soul, and any one who fulfils what he has covenanted with God,- God will soon grant him a great Reward.
The desert Arabs who lagged behind will say to thee: "We were engaged in (looking after) our flocks and herds, and our families: do thou then ask forgiveness for us." They say with their tongues what is not in their hearts. Say: "Who then has any power at all (to intervene) on your behalf with God, if His Will is to give you some loss or to give you some profit? But God is well acquainted with all that ye do.
"Nay, ye thought that the Apostle and the Believers would never return to their families; this seemed pleasing in your hearts, and ye conceived an evil thought, for ye are a people lost (in wickedness)."
And if any believe not in God and His Apostle, We have prepared, for those who reject God, a Blazing Fire!
To God belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth: He forgives whom He wills, and He punishes whom He wills: but God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Those who lagged behind (will say), when ye (are free to) march and take booty (in war): "Permit us to follow you." They wish to change God's decree: Say: "Not thus will ye follow us: God has already declared (this) beforehand": then they will say, "But ye are jealous of us." Nay, but little do they understand (such things).
Say to the desert Arabs who lagged behind: "Ye shall be summoned (to fight) against a people given to vehement war: then shall ye fight, or they shall submit. Then if ye show obedience, God will grant you a goodly reward, but if ye turn back as ye did before, He will punish you with a grievous Penalty."
No blame is there on the blind, nor is there blame on the lame, nor on one ill (if he joins not the war): But he that obeys God and his Apostle,- (God) will admit him to Gardens beneath which rivers flow; and he who turns back, (God) will punish him with a grievous Penalty.
God's Good Pleasure was on the Believers when they swore Fealty to thee under the Tree: He knew what was in their hearts, and He sent down Tranquillity to them; and He rewarded them with a speedy Victory;
And many gains will they acquire (besides): and God is Exalted in Power, Full of Wisdom.
God has promised you many gains that ye shall acquire, and He has given you these beforehand; and He has restrained the hands of men from you; that it may be a Sign for the Believers, and that He may guide you to a Straight Path;
And other gains (there are), which are not within your power, but which God has compassed: and God has power over all things.
If the Unbelievers should fight you, they would certainly turn their backs; then would they find neither protector nor helper.
(Such has been) the practice (approved) of God already in the past: no change wilt thou find in the practice (approved) of God.
And it is He Who has restrained their hands from you and your hands from them in the midst of Makka, after that He gave you the victory over them. And God sees well all that ye do.
They are the ones who denied Revelation and hindered you from the Sacred Mosque and the sacrificial animals, detained from reaching their place of sacrifice. Had there not been believing men and believing women whom ye did not know that ye were trampling down and on whose account a crime would have accrued to you without (your) knowledge, (God would have allowed you to force your way, but He held back your hands) that He may admit to His Mercy whom He will. If they had been apart, We should certainly have punished the Unbelievers among them with a grievous Punishment.
While the Unbelievers got up in their hearts heat and cant - the heat and cant of ignorance,- God sent down His Tranquillity to his Apostle and to the Believers, and made them stick close to the command of self-restraint; and well were they entitled to it and worthy of it. And God has full knowledge of all things.
Truly did God fulfil the vision for His Apostle: ye shall enter the Sacred Mosque, if God wills, with minds secure, heads shaved, hair cut short, and without fear. For He knew what ye knew not, and He granted, besides this, a speedy victory.
It is He Who has sent His Apostle with Guidance and the Religion of Truth, to proclaim it over all religion: and enough is God for a Witness.
Muhammad is the apostle of God; and those who are with him are strong against Unbelievers, (but) compassionate amongst each other. Thou wilt see them bow and prostrate themselves (in prayer), seeking Grace from God and (His) Good Pleasure. On their faces are their marks, (being) the traces of their prostration. This is their similitude in the Taurat; and their similitude in the Gospel is: like a seed which sends forth its blade, then makes it strong; it then becomes thick, and it stands on its own stem, (filling) the sowers with wonder and delight. As a result, it fills the Unbelievers with rage at them. God has promised those among them who believe and do righteous deeds forgiveness, and a great Reward.
O Ye who believe! Put not yourselves forward before God and His Apostle; but fear God: for God is He Who hears and knows all things.
O ye who believe! Raise not your voices above the voice of the Prophet, nor speak aloud to him in talk, as ye may speak aloud to one another, lest your deeds become vain and ye perceive not.
Those that lower their voices in the presence of God's Apostle,- their hearts has God tested for piety: for them is Forgiveness and a great Reward.
Those who shout out to thee from without the inner apartments - most of them lack understanding.
If only they had patience until thou couldst come out to them, it would be best for them: but God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O ye who believe! If a wicked person comes to you with any news, ascertain the truth, lest ye harm people unwittingly, and afterwards become full of repentance for what ye have done.
And know that among you is God's Apostle: were he, in many matters, to follow your (wishes), ye would certainly fall into misfortune: But God has endeared the Faith to you, and has made it beautiful in your hearts, and He has made hateful to you Unbelief, wickedness, and rebellion: such indeed are those who walk in righteousness;-
A Grace and Favour from God; and God is full of Knowledge and Wisdom.
If two parties among the Believers fall into a quarrel, make ye peace between them: but if one of them transgresses
The Believers are but a single Brotherhood: So make peace and reconciliation between your two (contending) brothers; and fear God, that ye may receive Mercy.
O ye who believe! Let not some men among you laugh at others: It may be that the (latter) are better than the (former): Nor let some women laugh at others: It may be that the (latter are better than the (former): Nor defame nor be sarcastic to each other, nor call each other by (offensive) nicknames: Ill-seeming is a name connoting wickedness, (to be used of one) after he has believed: And those who do not desist are (indeed) doing wrong.
O ye who believe! Avoid suspicion as much (as possible): for suspicion in some cases is a sin: And spy not on each other behind their backs. Would any of you like to eat the flesh of his dead brother? Nay, ye would abhor it...But fear God: For God is Oft-Returning, Most Merciful.
O mankind! We created you from a single (pair) of a male and a female, and made you into nations and tribes, that ye may know each other (not that ye may despise (each other). Verily the most honoured of you in the sight of God is (he who is) the most righteous of you. And God has full knowledge and is well acquainted (with all things).
The desert Arabs say, "We believe." Say, "Ye have no faith; but ye (only)say, 'We have submitted our wills to God,' For not yet has Faith entered your hearts. But if ye obey God and His Apostle, He will not belittle aught of your deeds: for God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful."
Only those are Believers who have believed in God and His Apostle, and have never since doubted, but have striven with their belongings and their persons in the Cause of God: Such are the sincere ones, Were We then weary with the first Creation, that they should be in confused doubt about a new Creation?
Say: "What! Will ye instruct God about your religion? But God knows all that is in the heavens and on earth: He has full knowledge of all things.
They impress on thee as a favour that they have embraced Islam. Say, "Count not your Islam as a favour upon me: Nay, God has conferred a favour upon you that He has guided you to the faith, if ye be true and sincere.
"Verily God knows the secrets of the heavens and the earth: and God Sees well all that ye do."
Qaf: By the Glorious Qur'an (Thou art God's Apostle).
But they wonder that there has come to them a Warner from among themselves. So the Unbelievers say: "This is a wonderful thing!
"What! When we die and become dust, (shall we live again?) That is a (sort of) return far (from our understanding)."
We already know how much of them the earth takes away: With Us is a record guarding (the full account).
But they deny the Truth when it comes to them: so they are in a confused state.
Do they not look at the sky above them?- How We have made it and adorned it, and there are no flaws in it?
And the earth- We have spread it out, and set thereon mountains standing firm, and produced therein every kind of beautiful growth (in pairs)-
To be observed and commemorated by every devotee turning (to God).
And We send down from the sky rain charted with blessing, and We produce therewith gardens and Grain for harvests;
And tall (and stately) palm-trees, with shoots of fruit-stalks, piled one over another;-
As sustenance for (God's) Servants;- and We give (new) life therewith to land that is dead: Thus will be the Resurrection.
Before them was denied (the Hereafter) by the People of Noah, the Companions of the Rass, the Thamud,
The 'Ad, Pharaoh, the brethren of Lut,
The Companions of the Wood, and the People of Tubba'; each one (of them) rejected the apostles, and My warning was duly fulfilled (in them).
Were We then weary with the first Creation, that they should be in confused doubt about a new Creation?
It was We Who created man, and We know what dark suggestions his soul makes to him: for We are nearer to him than (his) jugular vein.
Behold, two (guardian angels) appointed to learn (his doings) learn (and noted them), one sitting on the right and one on the left.
Not a word does he utter but there is a sentinel by him, ready (to note it).
And the stupor of death will bring Truth (before his eyes): "This was the thing which thou wast trying to escape!"
And the Trumpet shall be blown: that will be the Day whereof Warning (had been given).
And there will come forth every soul: with each will be an (angel) to drive, and an (angel) to bear witness.
(It will be said:) "Thou wast heedless of this; now have We removed thy veil, and sharp is thy sight this Day!"
And his Companion will say: "Here is (his Record) ready with me!"
(The sentence will be:) "Throw, throw into Hell every contumacious Rejecter (of God)!-
"Who forbade what was good, transgressed all bounds, cast doubts and suspicions;
"Who set up another god beside God: Throw him into a severe penalty."
His Companion will say: "Our Lord! I did not make him transgress, but he was (himself) far astray."
He will say: "Dispute not with each other in My Presence: I had already in advance sent you Warning.
"The Word changes not before Me, and I do not the least injustice to My Servants."
One Day We will ask Hell, "Art thou filled to the full?" It will say, "Are there any more (to come)?"
And the Garden will be brought nigh to the Righteous,- no more a thing distant.
(A voice will say:) "This is what was promised for you,- for every one who turned (to God) in sincere repentance, who kept (His Law),
"Who feared (God) Most Gracious Unseen, and brought a heart turned in devotion (to Him):
"Enter ye therein in Peace and Security; this is a Day of Eternal Life!"
There will be for them therein all that they wish,- and more besides in Our Presence.
But how many generations before them did We destroy (for their sins),- stronger in power than they? Then did they wander through the land: was there any place of escape (for them)?
Verily in this is a Message for any that has a heart and understanding or who gives ear and earnestly witnesses (the truth).
We created the heavens and the earth and all between them in Six Days, nor did any sense of weariness touch Us.
Bear, then, with patience, all that they say, and celebrate the praises of thy Lord, before the rising of the sun and before (its) setting.
And during part of the night, (also,) celebrate His praises, and (so likewise) after the postures of adoration.
And listen for the Day when the Caller will call out from a place quiet near,-
The Day when they will hear a (mighty) Blast in (very) truth: that will be the Day of Resurrection.
Verily it is We Who give Life and Death; and to Us is the Final Goal-
The Day when the Earth will be rent asunder, from (men) hurrying out: that will be a gathering together,- quite easy for Us.
We know best what they say; and thou art not one to overawe them by force. So admonish with the Qur'an such as fear My Warning!
